I love that both sides of my family are now represented with meaningful keepsake items. These are definitely treasures that will stay in the family for generations to come!
In 2 Timothy 4 the Apostle Paul was anticipating his own departure from his present physical body and to be in the personal presence of the Lord Jesus Christ. He knew he would be, but also he knew that it would be a rewarding experience. He did finish his course with joy. He had fought the good fight. I fear that most Christians don’t even want to fight.
To: elections
She is tall and lean built like and athlete. She is fast. She is brave. She is kind to others and is a good student. She makes friends with everyone.
Obama’s first apartment in New York, which he shared with Phil Boerner, a friend from Oxy, was at 142 West 109th Street. Heat and hot water were scarce commodities. When the nights turned colder, the roommates took to sleeping bags for warmth and spent as little waking time in the apartment as possible, holing up in Butler Library, at 114th, parts of which were open all night. Some mornings, eager to flee their quarters, they walked to the corner of Broadway and 112th to eat at Tom’s Restaurant, the place immortalized later as the fictional Monk’s, a familiar meeting place for the characters on Seinfeld. A full breakfast went for $1.99.
In my opinion God has only ever had one chosen people described as the Elect; the Remnant; the Israel of God.
Needing to think out loud so blogger gets it today.
“Well I think I have just the job fer ye ta handle in its place.”
No more reckless, words, sub-explaining, this marriage.
What do we do? What do we do? Do we hide it? Do we burn it? Do we attempt to use it for good only to have the power slowly corrupt us until we unwittingly betray our own morals and realize that we've become the very thing we hate?
Introverted Feeling: 9-14% (13.2%)
unconsciously soaking in derogatory
Speaking to E! on the red carpet at the Oscars, she added, “We say we have to go to.
Review by Sally Tyler
Ten Steps Towards Transformation
Satsy sees live band play at Michael's Arcade. Band consists of David Hineman, Robert Van Cleve, Eric Moorehead, and Scott Marder; plays "Summertime Blues" and "Breakin' the Law."
Don't get too upset now: I mean, in the ways of professionally approaching the craft. I will always be at least an amateur novelist...... if not anything more.
Companies in the U.S. added fewer workers than forecast in May, a sign that job growth is struggling to gain momentum, data from a private report based on payrolls showed today.
One of the things I like about Dr. Chapman – and see very clearly in this book – is that he believes in the power of God, but realizes the choices of man. Yes, you can do everything right – or you can do lots of things right – or you AND your significant other can do lots of things right, but everything doesn’t always work out right. That doesn’t diminish God’s power in any way, or His love for His children. This book continues to encourage Christians to seek God’s will, but constantly reminds the reader(s) that seeking God’s will is a personal choice, and you can’t force anyone else to do so – or even agree with you. It’s real, and about real life, something that is lacking in many “Christian” books.
It has sneaked up behind my and now has rattled my skull with the realisation that the gigs quickly approach. Today I received news from the Promoters at Wishful Music that the venue for the Groningen gig will be in a local photography Gallery http://www.noorderlicht.com/en/ Really pleased with this as it will mean we can get more people in to watch.
Finally, happy May Day. Who doesn't love a good old-fashioned pagan holiday to celebrate the rites of Spring? Sadly, I wasn't able to find a local celebration of dancing around the May pole. Maybe next year.
Okay so we all know I don’t have a dog but if I did, I’m sure the yard would need cleaned. And who’s to say there isn’t someone, somewhere with a dog and a yard that needs cleaned. It could happen somewhere just not at my house.
Why am I ranting about this today? Well, it's because once again Canada got caught spying on us.
Socks have become popular in many different ways. The website called “littlemissmatched” sells their socks in packages of three, and they are made to intentionally be worn in a mixed-matched fashion. Also, keeping them in stock of three allows for that one sock to go “missing” from the dryer, and it does not matter which pair you grab to wear that day. Children will love them because the do not have to hunt for a matching sock mate, it does not matter in today’s fashion sense.
“Can’t remember,” I mumbled just as the flash of a girl in pink satin swaying nervously in my arms shook me. I smiled. “She wore a pink dress. I remember that. And I was so nervous, I thought I might throw up.”
07 Entanglement
And the recent trial surrounding the mauling of a child by a pitbull reveals that our police work even more dangerous than dogs….turns out that the prosecutions case is incredibly weak because the police never determined who the owners of the dog are…..
Like wire-woven angels, hung in suspended evening
It gets a little better, a little easier,
Money affects every aspect of our life, sometimes in big and visible ways, and sometimes in equally big yet subtle ways. In any case, because of the key role money plays in our lives, transforming our relationship with money can lead to a transformation of our life as such, and not just our finances. But how can we transform this relationship?
Fridays - Challenge closes - approx 6.00pm Australian Time
And what do you think? It's a Snickers bar called Snickers Charged! And it's fortified with caffeine, taurine, and b-vitamins.
The "Poisson", after having swum passed, decided to maybe stay: in your plate, under your plate, on your tablecloth, a little bit everywhere, or elsewhere, or where we like it!
I woke up at around three and couldn't get back to sleep for hours last night. Was I worried about the news filtering in from the late night world service? Swine Flu or the situation in Swat? No? I was thinking about a book I had just read. And not in a good way.
If they ask you to do something reasonable do it – for example I recently asked someone to block me on facebook as I kept sending them messages and they wouldn’t so it continued and it wasn’t good for me to be sending them messages, I still felt like crap when they did block me, but at the same time I was relieved because I no longer had to fight the temptation to bombard them with messages.
Unlike Nashville, who has Shea Weber, Ryan Suter, and Mike Fisher, Phoenix does not have big names like the Predators necessarily. Captain of the Coyotes, Shane Doan, was drafted in the 1995 NHL Draft by the former Winnipeg Jets, who ultimately moved to Phoenix in 1997. Doan is just about nine years Predators captain Shea Weber’s senior and, although experience and wisdom comes along with age, Weber’s physique and youth may overpower Doan in the long run.
2. Saddle Up the Palomino - 3:00
* Dr Peter Miller, Division of Integrative Biology, School of Biological Sciences, University of Liverpool: "Are we affected? An educator's perspective on the virtual world Second Life";
Why doesn’t anyone ever call this liar out???
I will have the power for the GPS + MotionPlus + BT module controlled using a BSS123 nMOSFET, as explained here. When the car is off (can detect because Alternator pushes battery voltage to around 14.2), it will turn off the non-essential things and enter a sleep mode, where it wakes to determine if it should still sleep. Cars are noisy environments, so I will be using some techniques discussed here to protect the inputs of the ATMEGA328. This project shouldn’t take too long (ha) because most of the framework is there, I just need to add the code to sleep, to use the motionplus, filter the car battery voltage to power my circuit, and to parse the GPS data. Progress!
( I know I say this every 3 months when I reappear.)
If you would like to request an official cost estimate please note the following in your email to me:
when she was a little girl, she
And the twelfth strand of DNA is held by the pure white Selenite or Quartz crystals and vibrates to the number four as well. This is where you come to the end of cycles; wherever you are faced with a life changing experience, the crossroads so to speak, know that you are working with twelfth strand DNA issues. This is where the soul steps in, where spirit takes over and you can call it fate, you can call it destiny and it takes you where you must be. It is like everything becomes completely out of your control and the only choice that you have is to surrender, you can carry on and fight it if you want to but you will get tired. So it is rather to surrender to it.
You can do better than this:
-Amy Ketteran, Ketteran Studios
So how can you make it better? Infuse it with Cajun flavor!
I can say the same thing but
Slyfox Let’s go all the way
Allegra or Allie is a summoner and is good at her work but it can get annoying especially when she thinks a spirit is trying to make time with her. Of course she didn’t know at first that he was a Dark One named Christian. Christian wants his Beloved and knows she is out there and with Joy and Roxy’s help he will find her in Allie. Of course they will have to tell Allie that. There will be troubles convincing her of this new relationship.
2 policies
5mm hook
Fairy places, fairy things, Fairy woods where the wild bee wings … ~ Robert Louis Stevenson, The Flowers
In the course of events, such as they are, Raoul is visited by some benign giant puppets (a catfish, a jellyfish and a very peculiar elephant) and he quarrels with his own body, his reflection, his house, his other self. At last, when all his protections have been destroyed, we find him alone in the darkness, a joyous explorer of a new, mysterious world.
for us
I’m always going to want to make it move
If a character doesn’t work in a particular story, or grows in another direction, the story becomes different – a new story. If one insists on keeping the same story, then the characters must change.
"It's so light, yet has a steak like bite" I say. "Good pick, Babe."
I was trying it at the Beer Palace in central Oslo.
than what we have been told
Prayer for believers is a lifeline yet I am amazed how easily it can be to “misplace” it like a set of car keys. For instance, key’s are necessary to start the engine of the machine that can physically get us from point a to point b, prayer is that instrument that fires the cylinders of our soul to propel us into dialogue with our creator, savior, and teacher.
AnnaMae and Luke were really getting into the sidewalk chalk. I think we created some little tagging artists this weekend. They were having fun writing on everything and no one was stopping them.
“There are a lot of other husbands out there who have done worse and they have worked it out.”
I call it, "The Covenantal."
“How quickly can you pack?”
Via PRWeb I've just been reading the always entertaining and well-expressed thoughts of the eponymous Pete Fellows (Fellows and Associates), under the title "UK Intellectual Property Sector Shifts Focus, Says New Review". Pete forecasts "times of change for the private practice Intellectual Property market in the UK". In general terms, the market for recruitment and career moves is looking up, though good candidates for new positions are a bit timid when it comes to contemplating an upward move.
Roses, Lychees, Strawberries....All delicate flavours, which would compliment each other perfectly, I thought. Well, the stars were aligned perfectly this morning, as the cake turned out to be orgasmic!
And finds Its’ Own throughout all hilltops near and far, high and low; beloved each.
The Princesses came out one by one, and each one greeted us at our table - taking time to give Avery a hug, and pose for a picture or two.
Stretching for excellence,
One day Gautama asked his students to fetch some water. Some wives of the other rishis (rshipatnis) also reached the water spot at the same time. And they wanted to go first. The students came back and told Gautama’s wife about this. So she went along with them, and helped them get the water back for Gautama, who used it for his daily activities.
This is my second post today. Please scroll down to see my DT card for Cardmadfairy Digi Days challenge.
Save us a whole lot of unnecessary trials..
"False is the idea of utility that sacrifices a thousand real advantages for one imaginary or trifling inconvenience; that would take fire from men because it burns, and water because one may drown in it; that has no remedy for evils except destruction. The laws that forbid the carrying of arms are laws of such a nature. They disarm only those who are neither inclined nor determined to commit crimes."- Cesare Beccaria, as quoted in Thomas Jefferson's Commonplace book
I think most of the best decisions of my life have happened by default rather than any great reasoning powers on my part.
Mags' Advice to the World:
20 years ago he told me I had terrible teeth... "Soft" he called them and everytime I went to see him he would wonder how I had any left and I would tell him I keep a toothbrush in every room and sometimes floss for an hour.
when he shows up, cooking breakfast
The fossil species, named Rebellatrix or ‘rebel coelacanth’, was discovered by collectors from Peace Region Palaeontology Research Centre, at Tumbler Ridge, British Columbia.
The moment I dread
Camp will be held next weekend as well -- there are still spots available if any young writers in the Ventura County area would like to join us! Learn more at www.writeonbooks.org/festivalofwriting.aspx.
The newspaper is coming under heavy criticism today from residents in the greater Norfolk area, known as Hampton Roads.
There is a new flickr pool here for sharing beautiful landscapes, seasonal makes and winter's goodness. We will be uploading into it but if others join in then we'd love to make some mosaics each month.
I think I'm doing quite alright.
*Lucy is thankful for...Jack wrote that she is thankful for "uhhhh" which is the noise she made when he asked her. Sophie scribbled that out & wrote that Lucy is thankful for milk (because I am still nursing her.)
Winter came and winter went
I look and look for the love that will make me whole, but death reminds me, the fire shows me, that there is no other option but to find it in myself. The wellspring of love is within me, and I will be comforted and healed by it there, or not at all. I am alone with love, or I am just alone.
Old England's sons shall raise again
First off I want to thank Mark for letting me give away one of his awesome books. You rock! Second. Thanks for everyone who played along, and to my new followers :D
everyone have that "i nak nampak lawa" moments. even guys (hehee!). so when i said "some damages has been done", i meant that, in one way or another, i had probably encouraged hijabers to think fashion and photoshoots are.. good..
Well, I guess I was pretty naive because I must have been in High School before I figured out that they were actually the same person. And Sam did a pretty good show holding a job during the day only to drink his problems away at the bars on Church Avenue, and then from his pocket before he got home. But truth is from that day on we only saw his brother Irving walking up and down the block. And he never cursed, always wished my Mom a good day, and only walked with his cane touching the sidewalk.
As Nick Heidfeld made a pit stop at the Hungarian GP, there was a problem with one of his wheel nuts. This kept the car stationery for an extra 10-12 seconds. In readiness to leave the pit, Heidfeld kept the engine pegged at maximum revs. This extra delay was enough for the exhaust to start to overheat the surrounding bodywork. Without the usual pit fans blowing air over the bodywork, the carbon fibre soon started to smoke and then caught fire. Heidfeld was then released from the pit, as the wheel nut was properly fastened. Sparks were being blown from the car as he sped down the pitlane, this was the action of the exhaust blowing the fragments of the burning carbon fibre bodywork and not electrical sparks as some have speculated. The airflow over the bodywork only fed the flames and by the time he was at the pit lane exit his sidepod was well alight. As it was the bodywork itself that was on fire, the flames were on the outside of the sidepod and looked perhaps more alarming than was actually the case. Bodywork fires are not uncommon and teams have well rehearsed drills to meet the car in the pitlane with the pit fans and a precautionary fire extinguisher. Although it’s fair to say these sorts of fires are normally prevented by detail work to the shape and heat shielding of components early in the cars testing. Particularly around the exhaust which is the greatest source of heat within the sidepod. This year’s unusually long faired-in exhausts contribute a greater risk and the Forward exhaust exit (FEE) of the Renault only adds to the proximity of the exhaust to bodywork. With more conventional exhaust blown diffusers (EBDs), the exhausts are run along the floor to ahead of the rear tyre; these are slightly easier to manage. Additionally the heat shielded ducting for the Renault FEE, also provide a route for flames to exit out of the front of the sidepod, making the flames in closer proximity to the driver. This isn’t to say the Renault FEE is inherently unsafe. Any F1 cars bodywork left to overheat will see the flames rapidly spread across the skin of the cars sidepod bodywork.
Actually, I think showing myself on 위대한 탄생 has a meaning to all musicians in the underground scene in Korea, including Sweet Guerillaz. I just hope my appearances on the TV show will turn some more people interested in getting themselves into the live houses with strong attractive points from the scene.
I didn't realise that Academy Patterns were manufactured here in Auckland! Unfortunately I haven't been able to find out much about them so if anybody does know more about them please share - it will be an interesting slice of NZ history. I did find some sewing patterns from "NZ Cutters Academy" from the same era at Te Papa museum, but there were no images to confirm if this was the same company. I feel a quest coming on...!
I don't always share detail photos of my layouts, but I thought these were kinda fun today! I've really been into using watercolor to build my backgrounds lately. I love the depth it adds! And I managed to sneak in one of the fabric brads from the previous release - which I still LOVE.
Never post anything on the Internet or send something electronically that you don’t want the world to see.
I confessed as much to Tom.
I want choo
It is not God doing this in these preachers but Satan and their own flesh; added to their love for the world, and the things that are in the world.
Their hair was grey
In case you want to email Chad to see if there are other herb plant starts he's missing, his email is chadwilt2@gmail.com. I'm sure he'd appreciate any unusual herb cuttings you might have to share. You can mail them to him at Creation Gardens, HC 33, Box 75, Compton, AR 72624.
so i got sick.
a whole lot more kids
She: Darling!
Unimpressed and bored Mom remarks that everybody loves Oo-go, "You know who doesn't? Women."
Sniffed some glue,
There are other times within each of the seasons when cultural and religious and pagan festivals take place. Winter is Yule Time, a time that most know as Christmas…the Mass of Christ. Christmas has icons…angels, Santa Claus, the elves who are Santa’s helpers, the snowman, etc. But notice that winter is the season when the Sky Father and Mother Earth merge together. Look at Christian mythology. Go back and read the Biblical scriptures if you cannot understand this. In mythology, the Star of Bethlehem and the Christ child being born on Earth. Thus the Star Nation and the Earth are joined together in the winter.
You will need some flour, an egg and of course, Nutella. Make these in your mini-muffin pan for the perfect bite-sized treat. The original recipe also calls for hazelnuts but my kids aren't fond of them so I left them out.
Tomatoes-2
My brother and I stood on the bow of the ship watching as the europoort slipped away behind us into the early evening dusk. It came to us there and then that when we got back to Glasgow, we’d start a club and it would be called Europort – gateway to the European sound.
2. After meetings, he’s the first one you go to for a debriefing and, subsequently, to ask for help while you completely revamp the project your boss approved–and then forgot she approved.
But one brigade early in the forenoon order’d forward to engage the
A month has passed and there still is no payment. Does she really want to go to jail? Does she imagine that after she serves time that her debt is paid and she won't owe child support ever again. I don't understand this at all. She certainly kept running back to court every time Buddy even appeared to step out of line yet she doesn't think the same rules apply to her.
Solr was better than MSSQL/iSys/Zend put together. Awesome.
I remember Mama making Grandma Andrew’s Christmas cakes and selling them for one dollar a pound… and she made a bit of profit to help out. I decorated the cakes, using almond paste to make oranges, apples pears and bananas, coloured with food colouring. I piled them in the center of the cake with some leaves and they looked really nice. We put fringed cellophane paper around the outside.
I'm tired of hearing wealthy athletes, entertainers and politicians of both parties talking about innocent mistakes, stupid mistakes or youthful mistakes, when we all know they think their only mistake was getting caught. I'm tired of people with a sense of entitlement, rich or poor.
Moraji
May I be honest? I’m looking ahead to the annual celebration with somewhat mixed emotions. I’m not feeling very Mother of the Year. Instead of cooking dinner for my most deserving mama and enjoying her company, instead of reveling in the love of my husband, kids, and grands, (known as the Baby Czars of All Things Southern), I’ll be on the road, touring with my latest book “Sue Ellen’s Girl Ain’t Fat, She Just Weighs Heavy.” I’ve got Mama’s gift bought, wrapped, and ready to be delivered by my beloved hubby, and my grown kids understand that I didn’t choose the release date, but the facts remain: I won’t be there. (Shameless plugs time, anyone? My daughter blogs at Kitchen Belleicious and is raising funds to build an orphanage in Rwanda at Shelter a Child http://www.shelterachild.com/ and my daughter-in-law celebrates the daily details of getting to know the Holy One at Providence, http://providence-carey.blogspot.com). I won’t get to enjoy Mama tickling the ivory from the piano bench of Melbourne Baptist Church and I won’t be overdosing on baby sugah. Sigh.
Writing Community together!
Brick and Mortar: booth at 212 Broadway in Paducah
Now isn't that something? The day has been really fun and when evening came by, that's even more exciting. The Gala Dinner is held in the Grand Hyatt and we have Chef Tyler Florence as our guest chef for the night who will be cooking LIVE right in front our very own eyes. For me, that's almost like a cherry on top of a cake. These were the times I recall myself watching Chef Tyler Florence on TV during his younger days and now his latest cooking show titled 'Tyler's Ultimate' which airs on The Food Network Channel.
Thanks Hubby!
Lost Abbey Angel's Share bourbon barrel aged American strong ale
After the dough has risen, knead it lightly and divide into 12 equal pieces. Roll each piece until they are approximately 3.5 inches in diameter. Place 1 tablespoon of filling in each piece of though. Gather the edges at the top and press to seal.
Last Monday during a moving speech at the Holocaust Museum, President Obama announced an executive order allowing US officials to impose sanctions on foreign nationals using technology to carry out human rights abuses in Syria and Iran. A wonderful gesture which is totally and utterly arbitrary and probably unenforceable.
We are waiting on custom pillows for each of the chairs and an upholstered ottoman to anchor the seating area. There is also a desk in the room, my client's "command center," which needs to be outfitted. Our plans for that includes refurbishing a chair that was part of the set in her kitchen when she grew up and adding a memo board.
Friday night I was sitting in front of one of my favorite clubs/bars eating lunch in my squad car. I was hanging out at about 0200 hrs when I hear a bunch of yelling and see bouncers running toward the dance floor. Of course I get out and make entry into the bar. When I get inside I see that about 4 different fights are going on inside. The bouncers and I are slinging people out the door left and right. I call for some additional units. After most of the people are outside the bar I exit at well. I see one dude walking aggressively up to a bouncer. I tell him to stop, he refuses and then he gets slammed by yours truly. He is cuffed up and I look up and it seemed like everyone was fighting outside. It was a bad situation and nobody was there but me. Once about 7 units arrived we had everything under control. I end up arresting 3 people.
The sense of play is important. I watch a video interview on Youtube where the cutting of the footage deliberately distorts our ability to distinguish between the identical pair. There is no sense of their individuation; one twin works on the left of the studio, the other on the right. Like conspiring children, the Tobias Twins delight in the labyrinthine twists and turns of their own game.
4. Can your target market afford your product or service?
41. The moment one learns English, complications set in. —Felipe Alfau, Chromos (1990)
Not a proud moment, to be sure. I have never, ever been drunk since then. I have actually never, ever had more than 2 drinks in one 24 hour setting. I’m the designated driver. I would say that I’ve probably had 3 drinks this year, so far, and the last one was on the plane coming back to China where I dumped 1/2 of one of those little airplane sized Bacardi bottles into a diet coke… the other 1/2 is still in my cupboard… that was February 9th.
As I walked along something fell right in front of my face. Literally centimeteres infront of my nose. It went past my body and hit the floor, I hadn’t even broken step.
HELLO. Jesus. My heart honestly did not belong to Him.
I know what you're thinking: as bling goes it's pretty understated but you have to remember I'm a CAS kind of a girl and also that the card took only three minutes to make! If I'd had a bit more time, perhaps I would have stamped the hand again, cut it out with a circle punch and popped it up over the original (the 'ring' would obviously be placed on the popped up hand.)
The exhilarating mist for body and spirit that perfumes, tones and revitalizes with just one touch. Natural essences of citrus fruits (sweet orange, pink grapefruit, citrus leaf and orange flower) are blended to create a scent that is fresh, lively and delicately subtle.
But his state BN colleagues have called for polls to be delayed until the second half of the year, a sentiment echoed by their neighbours in Sarawak.
This was my 5 minute Stream of Consciousness Sunday post. It’s five minutes of your time and a brain dump. Want to try it? Here are the rules…
(starting @ waist band) ch47
I sure do a lot of things like she does..
Folks in town have had enough of kids and some adults who think it’s OK to drop high-volume obscenities in their otherwise bucolic downtown.
By the time we got out of the boat, I was so grateful for stable ground that the hills and the mountain we had to run over to get back to Avalon seemed inviting and non-rocking from side to side. I was ready to go, and that first 1/4 mile was so sweet and flat, then we hit the first hill.
These "wild yeasts" used in the fermentation of these products eats sugars that regular beer yeasts can't. There are a lot of sweet lambics out there - Lindemans for example - that are loaded with sugar. The unfruited versions (gueuze) from Hanssens, Cantillon, Oud Beersel and Drie Fonteinen will have the lowest sugars.
2 pounds strawberries
Mrs Mackay woke to find the knife pointed at her.
He couldn't help himself. "Not always." Though he made a deliberate effort to un-hunch his shoulders and walk straight, he knew he sounded sullen.
From the danicos little italy to the danicos little italy an address book, which holds the danicos little italy and numbers of your visit. The narrow winding streets, provides that sense of its most famous artists of all the info you could possibly need during your vacation in Italy. However, buying property in different locations in Italy. Long known as the danicos little italy of its modern day rich variety and culture.
It’s the back, who cares, right?! Me. I care.
On Friday evening TC led us through a speed scrap, giving a new instruction every 10 minutes. Mine, of course ended up a little different to the original instructions...but then I always think that is a good thing. I like it when we all put our own twist on things. The theme for this was 'God is Powerful' and I used a quote from Genesis for the journalling.
I'm really looking forward to Valhalla Rising tomorrow, and Robo Geisha should be a hot mess.
Son: "Well, she has lighter hair now and she keeps it shorter."
I was pretty excited to get these images back. Felt like ages before they arrived. I don't live near my photolab so I always have to post them my negs, get them to dev and scan, and then wait for the return post.
But Kalinda? Just because you're reserved doesn't mean you can hold all these things back from me.
3. After cutting off all the long strands, I went through and added another layer of grass (and trimmed this layer too) because I wanted to make sure that you couldn’t see any of the wreath underneath. This is not a necessary step since you are going to put the eggs on top of the grass anyway but it makes me feel better.
1 skin
Community RA+Edio spoke to Christopher Palmer, who lives in Swindon and has started listening to his community radio station, Swindon 105.5, in the last year. He told me that ‘there is something endearing about listening to community radio. You’ll hear them say things like “we can’t play music as the CD player is broken but don’t worry, Tony is on his way to Curry’s to buy a new one!”’.
4. Hum, whistle, or sing. It’s great when you’re happy, but let it be evident from how you treat people, not from how you annoy people. These sounds maybe soothing for you, but it’s like nails on a chalkboard for people who are trying to work. A co-worker could be crunching numbers, trying to figure out the latest sales projections, and then you belt out “Ohhh, say can you see? By the dawn’s early light…” Why?
Cover the six surfaces of the liver with the sweet/salted almonds and hazelnuts after inserting the vinegar inside the terrine, using a cinnamon stick, forming a heart of balsamico, closing the hole at the end with some foie gras until achieving a smooth surface.
Eventually, we arrived at the bottom, all in one piece, then took a break to check out a habitation site JB had spotted from above. In canyon country, that's what riding shotgun is all about, spotting habitation sites, and the ruins of cliff dwellings tucked into canyon walls. He's better at it than I am. But then, he's had more practice.
October 8 - Al Davis, AFL and NFL football executive (Oakland Raiders), 82
Now on to the Questions! If you want to play along just copy the questions and post on your blog. Remember to leave me a comment letting me know that you played along and don't forget to tell your friends :)
The design made it look as if Carlos was actually glowing, which might have been appropriate coming off of the '99 season he had. .272 average, 44 HR and 134 RBI, not too shabby to say the least. I took a quick look to see where he finished in the MVP voting that year, and he was 12th. If you get a chance, take a look at the numbers that the top 11 players posted, including Pedro Martinez's masterful season on the mound, and you'll see why he finished so low with those gaudy power numbers.
the obituary column of the daily newspaper.
Panacea Biotec Limited 25
Pursued by the police for having beaten his mother and sister, Remy (Olivier Barthelemy), a young redhead who has been bullied by his soccer teammates, is taken in by Patrick (Vincent Cassel), a guidance counsellor and fellow redhead. He convinces Remy that all his troubles stem from the colour of his hair. Vulnerable to Patrick’s influence, Rémy relies squarely on him when he discovers that his girlfriend, whom he met through a website, is actually a boy. Fed up, the two take to the road, with Rémy deciding to head for Ireland, land of the redhead. After initially refusing to follow him, Patrick changes his mind and gradually transfers control to Remy.
Mandy: ....
* In other whorish news, I was pleased to discover that a scene I wrote for the Campus pilot which involves a discussion of 18th century terms for prostitutes, but was cut out for length, has made it back into the revised episode one. Huzzah! So a big week for Georgian whores, which is nice.
I had an amazing childhood. It was fresh, chaotic, confusing, painful and at times, crushing. I was blessed deeply. We were blessed deeply with so many tears, laughter … joy and painful realizations. These memories unfold daily basis moment by moment … minute by minute…
I frequently get inspired by magazines/books/shows/blogs/websites and of course my beautiful sisters, and then tweak it to fit my home & personality. Reading, thrifting, finding bargains, singing, couponing, spending time with family, scrapbooking, and creating are some of my favorite things! Being a part of The Church of Jesus Christ of Latter Day Saints greatly enriches my life and makes me want to be the best homemaker/creator/problem solver I can be.
Waist: 22 inches
It ties in with some of what I've read in Six Degrees. Mark Lynas envisions a time when habitable land is diminished and there are climate refugees no longer able to coax any sort of sustenance from the parched soil. He envisions wars, and struggles for territory. I suppose things could be as bad, if not worse, than Communist Romania. Nothing is available. People struggle every day to survive, and they blame - not the people in charge, but the profligate people that went before. That is, us.
Philadelphia Eagles: A+
TO MAKE COOKIE GRANOLA: Spread half the cookie dough across a large parchment or silpat lined baking sheet. (The baking sheet must be lined, in order to make this recipe.) Grease your hands with a bit of butter and use your fingers to separate chunks of oatmeal into cookie clumps. Bake 10-12 minutes, until golden brown. Remove from oven, let cool for a few minutes. Use a metal spatula to scrape/lift the granola from the lined cookie sheet. Stir the granola in the pan and place back in the oven for about 5 more minutes. Let cool completely before storing in an airtight container. Enjoy!
I would love to see comments on any alleged disagreements with this list or any alleged additional words, or just any alleged jokes, arguments, random thoughts, etc. For more information regarding potentially offensive racial slurs, I suggest UrbanDictionary.com.
have 2 choices: (1) Copy & Paste this on your wall
The ‘Ripples in the Pond’ project ( the old boating lake) will be officially opened by Cllr Joan Barton who is retiring after representing Firth Park Ward for 34 years
Actually, that’s a lie. The only appropriate response to really knowing of the existence of such a monster would be to cower in terror and do anything, everything, to keep him from punishing us to the full extent of his omnipotence. Write a hymn? Done. An hour a day in silent contemplation of his glory and wonder? Have two. Sacrifice of my first-born son? I’ll get the kitchen knife. Never was that attached to the kid. But to respond like this, it’d be necessary to really believe in such a god in the first place.
Hours later the man calls home to his wife:"Jeanie, is the cat there?"
*Challenges: Fall To Layout 180
I can’t decide if I want to add it to a story I’m working on or start a new one to include this scene because it would dramatically change the storyline of the one I have plotted out and would need a lot of attention in story. I think I’m going to have to save it for a later fic so I can do it justice (teaser: Sam & Jack are trapped alone off world with no hope of rescue, Sam is attacked by native animals and loses her arm…enter the drama!).
Chart one shows the percentage of Boris's vote achieved by each Conservative assembly candidate in 2008 and 2012 and in each case the candidate fared worse than Boris in 2012 than in 2008, or if you prefer, Boris outdid the candidate each time. So, taking a wholly random example, South West's Tony Arbour polled 76,913 votes to Boris's 90,061 in 2008 - or 85.4% of Boris's total. In 2012 the figures were 69,151 to 92,180 and 75%. This gives a Boris Factor or BF of 10.4.
In both cases, trying to eat healthy or ordering what I want, I would rather eat the McDonald's meal (and I don't like McDonald's either). Neither place is particularly good for you, but, at least at McDonald's you're not fooling yourself into thinking you're eating something healthy. Panera somehow escapes people's scorn when it comes to serving bad for you food. I don't think they should, they're even more guilty of making bad for you food, because they serve it under the guise (whether intentional or not) that the food is fresh and good for you. I can't speak to whether it's fresh or not, but it's definitely not good for you.
1. "Travelin' Alone"
The other leg is overhung on one side by the same stone walls and bordered on the other side by the attractive facade of rue Commaille, a very quiet street. The end of this leg abuts on rue Bac, a street with a great deal more activity.
Homer Davenport was a cartoonist by trade. He was originally from Silverton, Oregon, but he made his way to San Francisco and then on to New York City. He was hired by William Randolph Hearst, and his drawings were biting social commentary on the news and personalities of the day.
Scientists believe embryonic stem cells are the best to use for tissue regeneration because they are pluripotent—meaning they can become any type of cell in the body. However, Dzau said there have not been enough experiments done to prove how functional the stem cells are in regenerating tissues and whether or not they may form deadly tumors.
Bff called me like two weeks later, “I was sooo proud of you!” she said with an almost reverent tone, with the love that only my agram ever gave me. I lolled.
Paul said he had no intention of abandoning his run with the Republican Party but hadn’t ruled out campaigning under another branch.
Oh and I saw a photo of Ted and the Slutty Pumkin (Katie Holmes) on Tumblr:
Last night Prince Talal Bin Abdul Alaziz, the king’s half-brother, did a TV interview on BBC Arabia that was widely watched and discussed. In it he warned of an upcoming storm if reforms aren’t dealt with right now. He used the word “evils” to describe what would happen if King Abdullah passed away before ordering the required changes. Prince Talal also strongly advocated a constitutional monarchy and democracy as long as it’s similar to what they have in Kuwait and Jordon. However he hinted that there were people in the ruling family who do not believe in change.
Sadly, I notice that many of these gifts are just being left on the corner gathering dust by the receiver. Many are still in their plastic wrap, unopened. I'm sure it's not because the receivers don't appreciate the gifts or presents, but because they are not to their taste, or they have no idea what to do with them.
Anyway, I crawled out of the hiatal cave to go to--of all things--Stiffelio last night. May be kind of dead-blogging it later with Squirrel, so only a word or two now, or maybe seven paragraphs.
500g of fresh spinach
I think however, most men should take the safer route to gauging than risky, until he has mastered and had a lot of favorable reactions under his belt.
CHEVRON
Stamp (Jet Black archival ink) from Curiosities
When stinging nettle is applied topically as an ointment or compress it is very effective in treating sprains, joints pain and even insect bites. It is used for rheumatoid arthritis, allergies, menstrual bleeding, hemorrhoids, high blood sugar, anemia and even eczema!
The same associations which ransacked the office of Zee Kannada last year protesting its move to air a voice-dubbed program on Jhansi Rani Laxmibai are at it again. Fortunately, this time Suvarna backed off before the associations took law into their hands.
Mother's Day Tiles:
With all this traveling, we do spend some money, but we still have a frugal core. We never buy new vehicles, we try not to spend money that's better spent elsewhere, we don't have to dress fancy or keep a vehicle under the demands of commuting. We homeschool, so we have no child care costs and no school activity costs. We eat grocery bargains at home (the RV is home), and we go as cheaply as satisfies when we dine out. And Joe is a helluva handyman when it means saving money (although he's delegated oil changes to the pros at this point, and as our vehicles get larger and newer, other repairs as well).
‘If you don’t straighten up, I’m going to knock you into the middle of next week!’
Sustainable Energy Issues in Education: Developing a Practical Applicable course in Sustainability – an Engineering Challenge.
The ideal of what I once
I am just so glad that no one was hurt in this horrendous blaze. ITV news headlined the report with ‘It is lucky that no one has been killed’ – my sentiments exactly (www.itv.com/news/border/story/2012-04-22/cumbrian-chip-shop-fire). According to some reports, the blaze started at 10:15 am, before the area became crowded with people milling around. See www.fire.org.uk/news/2012/04/23/road-closed-over-chip-shop-blaze-in-cumbria.html.
Together more often now. And more often, when we do travel as one, we carry the other so closely in our hearts, that even in our turmoil we know that the calm is coming.
i pause, fall to my knees, this is my confession
Going on four years later, memories of that conversation prompt a chuckle as Haley Pasion of Waipahu fights Amanda Pavone of Burlington, Mass., tonight for the bantamweight title in the USA National Boxing Championships in Colorado Springs, Colo.
She can see the barest traces of light squeezing through the gaps in the door. When that portal opens, she will meet her death. The question is will she die by the hands of Roman legionnaires or will Claudius deal with her personally? Only she knows the truth about him. The foundation of power he has carefully built through deceit and murder could crumble if she opens her mouth.
The StreetView collection of personal data was deemed to be a serious breach of the Data Protection Act 1998, but as a result of it occurring before the Information Commissioner had power to impose monetary penalties, Google avoided a fine and was merely required to enter into an undertaking to behave itself.
Another new discovery is City Greens. Someone just like me ate one too many Subway sandwiches ( over 10 years I probably ate at least 1,000 6 inch, whole wheat, veggie and cheese sandwiches) and then thought, "I can do better than this". City Greens is a modern, impeccably clean, incredibly fresh, express-service salad bar with interesting ingredients, signature salads, and a build-your-own option. I cannot wait to go there again and again and again. Thank you, thank you to the person who was just like me. Now, will you please open one in Metairie? Oh, and some of my friends would like you to carry Diet Coke. Go see for yourself at www.eatcitygreens.com
Hi everyone, happy Sunday!
The answer depends on what kind of yoga you do and how often you do it. There are a lot of claims that yoga will not help you lose weight. This is true of the most gentle types of asana practice which include light stretching and seated meditation. However, if losing weight is a priority, there are many of more cardiovascular types of yoga available that will raise your heart rate and help you lose weight assuming you are also watching what you eat. Yoga is also great for building muscle definition, making you look more toned.
Such a lovely day today, spent time in the garden, I love sunny days & waking to the sound of birdsong....Bliss!
Perpetually discontented, they don’t like what is, and want something — that they like better. A Utopian world where no one will disagree with them, and where they will always be in charge and have the power to do what they want without interference or objection.
2 tsp butter
Craig Michael Blass, 27, Greenlawn, N.Y.
My passion: Designing clothes. Nothing is more soothing than the frustration of creating clothes.
threatening to collapse at any moment
But the older I get the more I start to understand
If you click over to Use real butter you'll notice her dog is balancing a treat on her nose. Yeah Hobbes isn't to that level of obedience school yet, so you'll have to settle for these shots :)I used a shot glass to make larger treats, and then a tiny cookie cutter that came with a snow flake set to make the tiny "coffin shaped" ones, yeah that's what John says they look like. Hey, they are the right size for obedience class, so I don't care what they look like :)
9) The Beautiful Mothers - Chikara
The most eye catching element in this space had to be the caned wallpaper printed on a silvered background. It sort of gave the impression that the the building was open air, but it also added a bit of bling.....
This time I welcome Rhys Jones, who is the mastermind behind Thirst for Fiction Rhys is one of those rare and mythical beasts - a teenage boy who loves to read, and blogs all about it. I asked him whether he would be prepared to talk about why YA, and here is his articulate reply...
ColorMatters.com This is a fun site to just dig around in and find all sorts of interesting factoids on color. They discuss everything from Pink jail rooms to the Egyptians bathing in different colors of light.
When asked: How much more do you need?!?
I used to make up this sort of malarky for chatty taxi-drivers (not the dwarf bit, obviously, it would have hurt my knees), but this postcard thing has opened up a WHOLE new avenue for me.
You arrived at the hospital just after 10pm. At 10.55pm, on Saturday, August 6th, 2011, Eliza Grace came into the world and made you a mama. She weighed a perfect 7 pounds, 5 ounces, with blue eyes and blonde hair. I am so, so pleased for you that your labour was relatively short (and when I say I have labour-and-birth envy, obviously I know all labours and births are hard work - I am just so glad it all went so much more smoothly than my own!!)
But I'm a hard sci-fi aficionado, and I'm not going to deny anyone the use of a good blaster or a dramatic lightsaber if that's what they want in a story. What would you arm your sci-fi characters with?
Once upon a time in Malvern, a man called Morrison decided to build a shop. This shop would would be in a handy location, have a big car park, a petrol station and be advertised on the telly by people who pay people to shop for them.
"Although I knew what to expect in terms of ice loss from satellite imagery, I was still completely unprepared for the gob-smacking scale of the break-up, which rendered me speechless," he said in the statement. "I'm very familiar with the glacier. It's very hard to sort of envisage something so big not being there ... to come back and basically see an ice shelf has disappeared, which is 20 kilometers across (about 12 miles) ... I was speechless and started laughing because I couldn't sort of believe it," Hubbard added, speaking to msnbc.com.
When I was a kid, we carved lanterns. Not so often from pumpkins, they're an american import. Traditionally, they'd be carved in england from root crops, like turnips. And by strange coincidence, as country-living kids, we'd get turnips. or swedes. And we'd stick a candle inside, and tie a string handle, and go out, fearfully, into the dark. We'd have been primed with stories of witches flying on their broomsticks, with their black-cat familiars, we knew this was the night when the souls of the damned roamed abroad.
i even got my neighbor to share the
Oceanside Beach
Read the list of accusations. Note that many of them have been corroborated from 5 or more sources already:
Dreaming as the days go by,
Kate Hall
So, what’s the deal about the #33 – well it has all sorts of mystique behind it? Why not let them tell you all about it in their Town Gazette on line newsletter. Visit them here: http://www.rollingrock.com/#/small/story3/. Here is another pretty neat website to visit for a variety of facts: http://www.beer-faq.com/the-faq/beer-quotes/
If you have done no wrong
I know guys who keep the trigger pulled back so they could blow-and-go, or wired the safety back,,so they could blow-and-go- and I never liked working around them.
Remembering Mum’s Clothesline
A strange, cold wind raced up Jillian's back, over her head and down her arms. Her hands glowed green, and light poured from her fingers into the yarrow blooms and the gash in Indigo's side.
Does your family have a foundation? Are there a few guiding, unifying principles by which you work together and treat each other?
Lucky for us, today is a Yarnbomb day, and we are placing the grand marshal of all Yarnbombs, a pass it on challenge.It works like this: we are placing it on a light pole, it reads this.“This bit of knitting, or “yarnbomb,” was made with love and care with the intention of strengthening community and kindness. “This little yarnbomb has begun its journey in Los Angeles, CA. and hopes to make it all the way to New York, NY. “Please carefully and kindly place this yarnbomb on the next tree or pole, in the next city or state from where you find it, going in the direction of New York. “As a random act of kindness. “Then pull out your smart phone, take a picture of it, and email it to the address below (making sure to indicate who you are, in what city and on what object you kindly left this yarnbomb, and any other info you wish to share): Allspunout365@gmail.com “Then, visit the blog below to update yourself on this yarnbomb’s travels, which (with your help) will be updated daily. “Respect the process.”
A) Adventure
One of the first profound definitions of the term ‘community’ was shaped by Ferdinand Toennis in 1887: “Die Theorie dem Gemeinschaft geht von der vollkommenen Einheit menschlicher Willen als einem ursprünglichen oder natürlichen Zustande aus, welcher trotz der empirischen Trennung und durch dieselbe hindurch, sich erhalte, je nach der notwendigen und gegebenen Beschaffenheit der Verhältnisse zwischen verschieden bedingten Individuen mannigfach gestaltet.” (I never said it’s going to be a purely monolingual blog.)
"At the end of DJ'ing a party, people would come up tell me what a great evening they had, and it felt really satisfying," explains Greg. "I wanted to create something like that while helping those dealing with autism." Ales for Autism's inaugural event will be the Black and White Beer Ball held February 17th in Winsor, CA as part of San Francisco Beer Week. The event features both dark and white beers from leading West Coast breweries including Russian River, Lagunitas and Ninkasi Brewing. So while you won't find any brown, amber, red, or green beer their that evening, you will first a tasty variety of stouts, black IPAs, black lagers, wit beers, lagers, and other beers fitting the unique format.
Bassist for Queensryche
Wednesday, October 20th at 7 p.m.
At first glance, the color and texture of this flower call to mind an orchid. The complicated structure, complete with wing-like sepals, resembles a flying bird or airplane. Two petals are joined together to make a tube; a third, lower petal is fringed.
Image - Baby Tilda
After their discussions, the United States circulated a revised draft resolution that threatens both Sudan and South Sudan with “additional measures” under Article 41 of the U.N. charter, which allows the council to impose economic and diplomatic sanctions on countries that ignore its decisions.
So always use good
Last week Thursday, bf won the raffle at Muckleshoot Casino in Auburn, Washington! There must have been over a couple thousand raffle tickets in the bin! It was a really fun day for both of us. He ended up winning $450 cash. My parents were so excited when they heard the news. lol They're really into casino raffles. Haha, my Mom called me randomly during the work day to remind me to remind bf to buy Mega Millions lottery tickets because he's on a lucky strike!
I would recommend this beer to anyone and strongly suggest having one in an Irish pub where the pour the beer correctly with a sliver spoon. I am waiting on that trip to Ireland someday to have the beer the way it was intended to be served.
Who, through this froze and gilded window, peers.
"Spoons? Spoons?? OOOOH. Spons. A sponge?"
There is still time to sign up for giveaways...
Wanna make some homemade vanilla pudding? It’s worth it!
Phillip Lim has always been a favorite of mine because of his effortlessly cool style and his collection this year did not disappoint me. Some of the pieces I couldn't stop dreaming about were his tailored coats and the white dress with the little sparkle it had on the sleeves. Doo.Ri is another favorite and her clothes always look so comfortable and easy to wear. No one can drape as well as Doo.Ri and she really showcased her talent this season. (Hey Ms. Doo-Ri, Can I have those blue silk pants?) And last but not least, Vena Cava. I felt like their collection was what every cool girl would be wearing this fall. They had crop tops with cut outs on the sleeves, off the shoulder dresses, and long silk dresses - perfect for a night out.
We know the end result of both doors. The long term end that is. The doors all end in death. We cannot avoid it. Even if we were to try standing still and never move, we have chosen our exit from the world. And what a sad, desperate exit that is too. So what exit do we chose to use?
Through the do-gooder grapevine that is grade two, Amy learned of my hatred. And do you know what that hussy did for the rest of the afternoon? She cried. And she whimpered. And she lamented, “But I thought we were friends! This morning we were friends! We even shared a bag of Welch’s fruit gummies. Isn’t that what friends do?” My teacher got involved. My classmates got involved. My babysitter got involved. And my guilt definitely got involved. By the end of the day, it was all I had just to crawl home, burrow into my bed, and hope time would fast-forward itself ten years. Because surely, teenagers never had to deal with this kind of bullshit.
2. Inflamed caller and smooth politician replying, both unidentified. Radio call-in show, New York, July 1979.
LH Milk Stout
As soon as I start working with an editor or artist on the cover, I’ll be sure to update you all! I guess now I’ll go play with my little boy and the other not-so-little boy who is actually a girl!
I turn to the stove. I am heating chicken marsala. The perfectly cooked, tender mushrooms sink into the succulent gravy. The velvety brown sauce will cover the pasta nicely. No, ‘pasta’ is a lie. ’Pasta’ is word given to us in District 1 to make us believe that what we are doing is creating cuisine and—that is not the case; I am simply making macaroni. It’s hard to escape the scourge of elbow noodles in District 1 and I wouldn’t try, President Mud has a keen eye.
On the Blue Team, Tony suggests mini blue cheese bacon burgers, and everyone says no in unison (why?!). Already Tony is annoyed. They decide on chicken chili, seasonal veggie salad, arugula and prosciutto pizza, sliders, and cookies. But their burger buns are full size, and Max wants Tony to cut them with a cookie cutter… because that’s efficient. Oh, and Gordon says the burgers are bland, and need to be re-seasoned, which gives Max another reason for a superiority trip, and Tony another reason to get huffy.
94. Monkey dress e pickney till he spoil. Don’t try to over do something, keep it simple.
This week’s theme is – AGREE , Nod, accept, etc
Here is a card I have made and can actually show you
I always thought Pecan Sandies were the exclusive creation of the Keebler elves. That turns out not to be true, and Pecan Sandies can be made at home. This was my first try at making cookie dough with the food processor, and I found it to be a very quick and easy process. These cookies would be excellent with tea or coffee.
“The Android Invasion” was written by Terry Nation and directed by Barry Letts, and it’s difficult to not point fingers in their directions, although if we’re being honest, Hinchcliffe and Holmes surely deserve some scolding as well. Nation wrote some great Doctor Who stories over the years – all of which featured the Daleks. He could write the hell out of the Daleks, but I’m not sure he was necessarily a great Doctor Who writer, and there is a difference. He only ever wrote two non-Dalek stories for the show – this one,
He continued to invigilate over her then proceeded to instruct her as to how best to make the calculation,finally resulting with two separate bills.'Are you happy with that??'he said smugly.
Just for fun, This Momma even dressed up like a pirate for the party...
It’s remarkable that he never had a day even remotely like this in his seven-Tour run. He always appeared to have luck on his side – recall the Beloki crash among other moments.
Requiem (exploring heartache in seven pieces)
Fibre2Fashion, 04/06/2011
Cut to a few days ago. With visions of chic khaki editorial spreads dancing in my head, I took out the Worst Shorts In The World, hacked about 6 inches off the legs and cuffed 'em. Paired with a sparkly black tanktop and blue hoodie they were perfect for a long city walk with a friend and I felt like I had conquered the khaki trend on my own terms. I got a few compliments on my new look. I was pretty proud.
Well, one weekend, last fall, when maybe I was feeling sorry for myself because I wanted to go to a WVU football game and wished I had someone to go with..but I also decided to prove to my lunch pals that there aren’t any guys out there. Just goofball heads. So, I looked through the Yahoo personals…..Page one…..yikes!…Page two……omg!..,,,.Page three………seriously?…….Page four…….Teeth????……. Page 5…..Wait! Why is he on yahoo personals? I ran across someone I sort of knew…..Weird, he shouldn’t have any problem finding
Hey, some people wonder why you bother with Nissan when you’ve got Honda and Toyota.
He showed Moses how he went about his work,
- my little girl's 'Open Door Day' at her ballet class
Background Image: Wilton Jumbo Confetti Sprinkles
But no matter how relaxing that is, it’s still a job to do revisions! (Revisions themselves aren’t the bad part, the bad part is when you over-do your editing and destroy your scene. How do I know? Just trust me, I know.)
2 teaspoons finely grated lemon zest
We started out on my new place. This happiness that is occurring, which stems from the new place. The newness of it all is keeping me active. Keeping me busy. Apparently it’s making me happier- even though I can’t feel a difference. And I think that statement right there sums up everything.
~~Alyssa
Trying to get over someone is a right pain in the arse.
until I get to that place where the bottom of your lip meets
Week 2: Social Media (Part 2)
It has been so exhilarating in Hamburg again, it is really too bad you could not accompany me! I had a whole forenoon to idle around and made so good use of it, and we could have had a ball together! First I went to the excavation sight in Hamburg`s center where they found the remains of the probably first Bishop`s Tower from around 830, of the time when Hamburg, then called after the Hammaburg (Burg meaning castle) was a place from where the Christian belief was spread towards Scandinavia and Slavia. It was (and is) surrounded by three rivers, and so it was hard to destroy. People then loved to destroy other people`s castles, most medieval towns in Germany still have the remains of their old city walls around their inner circles.
Like I say when the dogs are horsing around, “Quit having fun, will you!” Back to business. I like to have the food and water ready before taking any chicks out of the box. I also use newspaper for the first day or so, and place food and water stations at each side of the hover, my theory being that the chicks need to eat and drink and I don’t want them to have to look for it the first few days. I graduate them fairly soon to reel feeders and the bell waterer and take away the papers and small waterers. And yes, do change the papers every feeding.
To avoid these things.
Why am I moving? Well, because after MONTHS of speculation, we finally learned this morning that we'll be moving our small little team on to a larger "umbrella" team called TMS (Team Member Services...what the rest of the world refers to as Human Resources). It's a change that I'm happy about and that makes a ton of sense, although I'm sure there will be the inevitable adjustment period where we have to figure out exactly how we're going to best fit in with the rest of the sub-teams.
“To Let. A valuable site at the crossroads of the world. At present on offer to European clients, outlying portions of the estate already disposed of to sitting tenants. Of some historical and period interest. Some alterations and improvements necessary.
It's not an argument.
State: Chillin with the wife, watching Real Housewives of Atlanta
Language : Telugu
Gil questioned officials at U.S. headquarters who told him they were under direct orders from the Department of Justice and that he should say nothing to the Mexican government about the program.
watching the rest of Jack's pee wee baseball games
He has his eye on someone else?? Act casual Kate ACT Casual
And we, inside this house, are filled with hope. Promises of light and warmth, new green things and multi-hued blossoms getting ready to burst forth. And I understand why God gave Noah the rainbow as a sign of His promise; a sign of hope. The wetness of the rain, the sun and all colors mixed together makes your heart soar and your feet light, and awakens in you an urge to dance and sing.
These letters and other words are those prayers inside her head.
To inmates, "The Joy." To the screws, "The Mount." To the locals, "Mounters," "Joyo," "Priso," "Ountjoyp." Home to de Sade in his senility and madness, to Behan in his cups, to several popes (frocked, defrocked and unfrocked), and, a surprise to many, quite a few little old ladies, some of whom just love the place and keep coming back simply because they enjoy the company and the warmth, others amongst them who cannot help but come back because they are so thoroughly institutionalized they cannot cope with life on the outside. Sartre once said, ridiculously, that every man is free, even in prison. What he forgot to add is that even outside a prison's walls, a man can carry a prison inside his head. The former inmates of this particular asylum are frequently damaged in this way. Once the madness acquired in this particular building gets under your skin, it can require decades of re-education, beatings, and waterboarding to flush it out of you.
Total weight gain: According to Natalie’s naked scale, +4. Up 2 lbs. from last week, ouch!
Mhmm. He knows Mommy doesn't stand for that. Daddy laughs and sometimes gives treats. Then yells at him next time he begs. He is just confusing poor Zeus. Either always give in, or never give in. Going back and forth isn't nice.
Delorus was MUCH more difficult and set up a great racket of clucking while I tried to hold her. She broke free and beat me in the face with her wings and I had to body-slam her to keep her from escaping before the job was done. Clip-clip-clip and both hens were now ambling around the backyard. I was grinning from ear to ear, watching them go hell for leather on the leaf litter beneath the gumtrees, pecking frantically at the grubs beneath. However I was nervous as a new mother and hovered by the kitchen window, keeping a watchful eye on their exploits.
For now it seems that the revocation of the agreement incurs few political costs for Egypt. The agreement supplying Israel with natural gas was, in fact, a commercial agreement, unlike the oil agreement between the two nations, which appears as an appendix to the peace agreement. Although the June 2005 agreement was backed by a “political umbrella,” it seems that the Egyptians are not attributing much meaning to the latter. From the beginning, the Egyptians sought to avoid deep political commitments to Israel as much as possible in order to downplay the importance of the gas agreement for normalization between the nations, and perhaps even to prepare the ground for its revocation. This theme was already apparent
"Pit Bull bans don't cost us anything and would make us safer!" This was an interesting comment from someone who seems to think laws and their subsequent enforcement appear out of thin air and cost nothing to uphold. There was some interesting data gathered on the expense of enforcing a breed ban in Prince Georges County, Maryland. It cost $500,000 a year to enforce the ban. Maybe an acceptable expense? But the data determined “the public safety benefit is unmeasurable.” In other words, it was impossible to tell if a ban had any effect whatsoever, although it was determined that the ban impeded animal control's ability to appropriately respond to complaints in general, so there is reason to believe bans actually make people less safe not more.
Clearly it’s foolish to insist that trustworthiness exists when we have evidence to the contrary – however the solution is not to stop trusting.
Uffish Thoughts: The Rhetoric is Getting Out of Hand
That story stemmed from a real life incident. One of the writers used to work on a different show. At the end of a long grueling season he and his girlfriend took off for Bora Bora. It required several flights, a boat, and a bus to get to this incredibly remote resort. They arrive in their room, unpack, and this writer goes out to the balcony to enjoy the view. And who is on the very next balcony? The show runner he traveled 10,000 miles to forget. We knew we were going to use Bebe again that season so this seemed like a perfect story. Frasier finally finds a woman he really likes. They go to the end of the earth and there’s Lilith.
My mother had her first diagnosis when she was 56. I was pregnant with my daughter. She opted for a lumpectomy and had the required chemo and radiation.
Woman reigns, but does not control.
You've got a story about the disconnection between what someone says and what she does, and how others see her. You have to convey that right here, first paragraph.
Nov. 28: Taft Theatre, Cincinnati, OH
They're blaming it on longer hair
And here is where the neglect comes in to the point of abuse. Angels in Waiting was offering full spectrum care for all 14. Meaning the older 6 would have been evaluated and their special needs addressed, which now will not happen. That is child abuse. Period. There is reportedly a child with mild speech delay, who has only a short window, and she is willingly denying her child that.
Well, as most of my books are sold direct to libraries and schools this may not be such a problem. But, I know as a consumer, I am more likely to pick up a book which I like the cover of, than a plain boring cover that just contains the title and author names. So, I had to think of something good.
The wife and I didn't know what to expect, and honestly had not been to a beer festival like this before. I got a GREAT cheeseburger at this school bus like joint. You walk in and there were a half-dozen or so portable food trucks (nice stuff), as well as stands for various types of hot sauce, beer desserts, and sweetbread. Nice stuff.
Lady was happy to see me this morning, and I was happy to see the old girl. The folks at the kennel raved about how good she is. I sent over more food and treats than she actually needed, but they were all used up. They must have added more wet food to her bowl than I do, and I'm sure they fed her more treats. If it made her happy it's ok with me.
The menu is, by bistro standards, both extensive and eminently affordable. Entrées start at around 7 euros and peak at 15. Mains run the back-pocket gamut from 17 euros to 35. A dessert will set you back anywhere from 7 to 12 euros.
It was my husband who first said I had pretty feet. I was 25 years old, and on the phone with my sister. While jabbering away Tony was playing with my feet and toes. As I playfully kicked him off he said, “You have beautiful feet.” I smiled at him and then intentionally looked at my feet, perhaps for the first time. Hmmm, I shook my head and shrugged. I saw nothing special. So what did he do? He gently placed a match between my toes and lit it. Smilingly, we both watched it burn. As I listened to my sister on the phone, I half-thought, “He’ll blow it out.” But when the flame reached my skin I reflexively flung the phone and kicked up my foot. He jumped in surprise as much as I did. “Why?!” I asked him – half shocked, half laughing. Hot Foot was the term I think he used. He honestly thought I’d shakeout the match before it burned me. Some joke. I was laughing when I told my sister what had happened. She was quiet. Silly newlyweds, she probably thought.
Looking forward to this week: Spending some tiem with the kids, with NO WHERE to go! Cheer & Football are over, and the kids have 3 days off this week… so it’s Pajama week here…. no going to the store, no appointments… NOTHING
America has some advantages over us. Your First Amendment guarantees free speech. You have fewer Muslims that Britain statistically, and most importantly, you have faith. Judeo/Christianity is still a force to be reckoned with here. In Britain, the left triumphed in undermining religion some years ago and the defeat of Christianity as a driving force in Britain has removed a considerable obstacle to Islam.
Here’s what the finished knot looks like:
D- “Such a failure, are you even relate to me?”
I am also going hunting again on Sunday so I'm very excited for that as well.
London's burning, London's burning...
Inside bottom line, payday loan suppliers will typically price the actual total to be returned and on what time (commonly your next or next-but-one particular cash advance).
I’m not saying to be grateful for what you have, because it’s been said 90 trillion times, and yes, everyone takes for granted what they have, and so on and so forth. I’m asking myself- and maybe you too- what can I/we do to help? It’s a big job to end poverty. I’m not trying to take that entire job on- nor am I asking you to. But I do know that the part of me thats been there since I was 8 is to help people.
First off, do I need to say anything else other than pork belly? I don't think so, as in my book, pork belly ranks at the top of the list, yes, even above the bacon! Sin! Say it isn't so! But it is, sorry bacon!
And then the nurse comes round and everyone will lift their heads
and all ate the same spiritual food;
WOWZA with all the Furry Friends entries last week! Everyone must be ready for hibernation with winter quickly approaching, there were so many bears, mice, kitty cats and pups in the links! Thank you to everyone who continue to play along with our challenges. We love having you here.
Oh, things ain’t what they used to be.
Then I went to NBC.com and was asked to fill out a survey. The worst thing was, I was instinctively inclined to say I didn't hate a lot of stuff I do hate because I was afraid everyone would say that. NBC and the internet would be forced to admit that no one likes shitty ads or exciting content on websites and no one buys anything because of a dumb commercial forcibly interrupting the videos they are watching. If anything it turns us against said product. It is something we deal with because it could be worse. They could realize how useless it is and they could make us pay for content. I love the internet, but nowhere near the amount required to willingly and directly pay for content. I don’t know if you look at content on the internet. You are right now. It’s not that great and there’s a ton of it.
My mum helped me to stamp this image, she's called
It was good to see the Dubberlys again, but, after a bite to eat, we hit the sack, totally exhausted but scenes from our fabulous trip dancing in our heads.
Communication. Teamwork. Preparation.
Then we went home again and watch a bit of anime. Then we picked Fal up and Meta cooked this really good Chinese BBQ style tofu. THEN we went shopping for the rest of our supplies. So… yeah, I think I may have overdid it a bit.
“There are a lot of things that I’ve went through, and a lot of stuff that I’ve adapted to bring forth the change within me, and I don’t know if that’s positive or negative, at all.” Jenro added.
The basic premise: in the 1990s some asteroid crashes in Italy (near the Tiber river, where the name is from) with some weird alien mineral on it. The mineral spreads easily and rapidly along the surface of the Earth. It literally sucks the ore out of the ground, which makes it very valuable. It also causes cancer and mutations because why not. The military wing of the UN, called GDI, are forced into an asymmetric war with a fanatic cult army called the Brotherhood of Nod (who are lead by Kane from the biblical story Kane and Abel, no seriously) for control of the planet and both organizations are funded through the harvesting of tiberium.
It was 4:05am when I left. I didn’t feel very rested and my legs didn’t feel all that solid. My toe-tips hurt and my butt was still sore from all the riding yesterday. Maybe if the place to stay had been more comfortable, I’d have contemplated staying back another day, but given the situation, I was more than happy to leave and get to Sagara.
14.What do I get experience for?
It was the end of August when we moved back home and we spent the next couple of months living in a construction zone while the contractor completed the kitchen and several finishing details inside. As a result, last fall we barely found time to put some bulbs in the ground before nighttime temperatures started dropping below zero and to leave the rest until spring. Spring officially arrived about 6 weeks ago, and after a couple of warm, sunny days last week, we decided it was time to start implementing the rest of the landscaping plan.
I'm not going to knock myself out looking for this beer, but I think it may appeal to some of the same people Session appeals to, but draw them further into the quicksand of good beer--from which, I hope, they will never escape. If it does that, well, that'd be rippin' gnarly, dude.
Every line in the Committee’s report is a poignant statement on the culture of official corruption in Nigeria. However, for the purpose of this briefing, we are highlighting the most tellingly embarrassing aspects of the book of larceny.
Public at large – excepting some emotional outbursts on cricket matches or on days of national significance or on playing of a national song – is generally fragmented and busy in managing their way through soaring prices, dimming lights at home, thinning CNG, and deafening acts of terrorism.
This film is basically Gunn’s love letter to 1984′s cult favorite The Toxic Avenger, which was directed by his former bosses at Troma Entertainment Michael Herz and Lloyd Kaufman. Like Super, The Toxic Avenger deals with an ordinary man exacting punishment on the unjust by killing them. The TV super-hero The Holy Avenger is even a wink-and-nod reference to the film. Gunn even wrote a book about his time at Troma entitled “All I Need to Know about Filmmaking I Learned from The Toxic Avenger.”
So, I have decided to try out a new weekly "spot". For those who have read back in the blog, we used to have a "Toddler Tuesday" piece but seeing as how I no longer care for toddlers...
I used taping instructions from Young House Love. Matt had helped me last week to mark the corners with the proper measurements... so all I had to do was connect the lines with tape making sure I was either inside or outside the lines (Read their directions... they make a lot of sense!). I used blue scotch tape... though many will say they like the frog tape.
I get that you want feedback. I run this site to provide it. Under NO circumstances will I provide private coaching. Sending emails asking for that, even in the most laudatory terms and couched in compliments annoy the fins off me.
It’s been a year since I went to work. I want to say it all started then, with a pain in my right knee, but I know now how untrue that statement is. I’ve had arthritic like pain, fatigue and depression since I was in high school. I had learned to live with all these things, thinking they were normal, that everyone felt that tired, had the same aches and pains. I just whined a lot more than anyone else. Severe depression began in August of 2010 and really came out of nowhere. Muscle spasms began shortly after, starting in my eyes and my abdomen. Then came the pain and fatigue that made it impossible to work. I tried taking up knitting until the pain moved from my lower body into my arms. I was sensitive to the lightest touch and sex was impossible. I went to my OB-GYN, who I’d been seeing for 11 years. He insinuated that I didn’t really want to have sex, that my husband was abusive and then proceeded to call me crazy (ha ha, nervous laugh after he saw that I wasn’t laughing). I couldn’t read the books I loved because holding them was too difficult. Not only did I have pain in my hands, I couldn’t hold them still. I had muscle spasms all the time. Falling asleep and staying asleep became a once a month event. The pain in my jaw made eating difficult and even holding a fork seemed like too much pain and too much work. The pain in my face was unbearable. It felt like someone was sticking me with tiny needles. I even had muscle spasms that had me doing the Elvis lip and a bunny nose uncontrollably.
I've visited dozens of post-apocalyptic worlds of every imaginable catastrophe: nuclear war, asteroid collision, viral contagion, alien invasion, ecological disaster, and socio-economic collapse to name but a few. Whenever a new game is announced to be set in another post-apocalyptic world, there is a collective sigh and rolling of eyes among some gamers who then castigate the industry for lacking originality. While their complaints are not without merit, it seems to have little bearing on their purchasing decisions. I think there is something other than laziness behind this preoccupation with the end of the world.
Gathered.
a heavy reckoning to make, when all those legs and
The wild card in this deck is really the kudkuran, or coconut grater, as it is known in the Philippines. Also called kabayo (from Sp. caballo=horse) for the way one straddles it, this simple contraption that looks like a wooden footstool with a metal tongue is very much an integral tool in the Filipino kitchen. I brought back one of the round, serrated blades after my first visit to Manila several years ago and attached it to a wooden stool from a craft store. Later, I found kudkurans at our local Asian markets, selling for about $15US.
The Cuban Missile Crisis was a much more defined event than today's always-there threat of terrorism and far-off war. It allows Wittlinger to provide a beginning, middle, and end of the tension and fear the children and their parents experience, providing a much-needed resolution for both Juliet and the reader. At the same time, the reader is left to draw their own parallels between Juliet's experiences and emotions and their own lives in today's world, with terrorist attacks and the ongoing war in the Middle East. Does Juliet hiding beneath her desk to survive a nuclear attack make any more sense than asking children to take off their shoes at airport security?
That the intergalactic review for planet Earth in the Hitch Hiker encyclopedic guide reads just ‘harmless’ (“Well, they had to edit it down a bit” says Ford Prefect, the journalist who sent in his report of Earth after 20 years of study). Then the Earth is destroyed to make was for a hyperspacial bypass. It’s shocking. All that we have known. All the animals and plants, all the culture, the achievements, the struggles, all wiped out in seconds for no real reason. It’s funny because we know it’s a metaphor for something else, something very real and pernicious.
I have spoken to other mothers, too many ‘like’s ‘ummmmmm’s, irritate them to no end. Why do they need to say so many ‘like’ s! Strangely enough, I find this kind of talk endearing and very age specific. Yes, I know, I may be the only one! I have seen most of them use such language with each other, but when they talk to grown ups, or give a presentation in class or in debate seminars they talk like we do…I was going to use the word normally, but as Sahana always points out ‘normal is relative’! The point is, this lingo is more of a bond between teenagers. By speaking this way they conform, belong and feel close to peers ’I get you, bromie (bro and homie, in case you were wondering) even if the world doesn’t! I talk like you, I think LMFAO, Nicki Minaj and others of the same ilk are totally cool, even if the parents frown upon the lyrics!’ They will probably speak this way at age 12, 13 maybe 14 and then move on to becoming young women and men of grace and poise. Too much?
and every time I see a rainbow now,
The Islamic principles of Hijaab include protecting the dignity of women and saving her beauty for her husband – not for every hot-blooded guy in the vicinity. I think it’s great that more Muslimah are wearing the hijaab but which do you think is better? Wearing hijaab and loose clothing that does not reveal the shape of a woman? Or wearing hijaab and tight clothing, such as leggings, which reveals the shape (and which attracts a man’s attention)?
The story of the blind Chinese Lawyer who is caught between the idea of fleeing or the doom of staying in China to fight literally a "Blind" legal system has sunk in deeply with my conscious. For me I take this case as a personal attack on my family. See I have a Chinese child that is a bi product of gross human rights violations. How "lucky" was Isaac that Chen called attention to forced abortions, that could have been him. But still, Chen's work was not enough to preserve his family ties.
Hide is not Hitler, but there are some on the fringes of ACT Party politics with unsavoury links to the far right and neo-Nazis in New Zealand.
Are more people actually involved in these activities than ever before? Or are we simply exposed to more of what they’re doing, because their activities are discoverable online?
‘Xica do Silva’,
The Summer IK turned up yesterday. Absolutely the last thing I need now is to fall in love with a new yarn, but I fear it is happening – “Freia Fine Handpaints distributed by KnitWhits” – that cardigan p.80. I am less than totally enthusiastic about the cardigan itself – any suggestion that there is any difficulty in buttoning across the stomach (as in the photograph) is not a look to which I aspire.
What the hell was going on? She thought as she went back around the table. Why do I feel like I am being treated as a suspect?
Sierra just smiled. She knew that wearing brown silk slacks and a crème linen tank top with matching blazer did not comply with the office dress code. When Mr. March had hired her, he had informed her that navy-blue, gray and black were necessary colors to create a professional impression in a public accounting firm. As of today, she did not care.
Analysis: So, Richardson isn’t exactly unanimous, but he’s my new favorite for the pick. I was initially a big supporter of Morris Claibourne, I still think he’s a good pick up, but I can’t help thinking Richardson is too good to pass on. He gives the Browns help as a runner, receiver and pass blocker…sort of like 3 birds with one stone. I considered making Claibourne my surprise, but that’s kind of a lame surprise, instead I’m going with Michael Floyd, he’s 6’2 he’s fast, good hands and he’s local having played his college ball at Notre Dame so you know the front office has seen him play.
Got a question from a reader on the comment section. Instead of answering there, I thought I’d just write it in an entry. Here’s what the reader said, as well as my answers. As always feel free to chime in with your input.
MAC Lustre drops in Pink Rebel was used over the cheekbones and brow line to highlight.
After the Space Shuttle program ended last year, everyone from scientists to politicians to the public is discussing the future of the national space program. At the May Eastside Science Café, join us for an interactive discussion with local researchers to explore some of the unresolved key questions about the future of space exploration, including: What do we want to learn about space? Who will it benefit? Who will pay for it? What should we do next?
How cool is that?!?!
experienced less colic than babies fed with a conventional bottle.
I have several Food Network episodes to watch, from some of my favorite chefs-- like Anne Burrell. While I fast forward through many of them, I'm sure I'll bookmark a few to make at a later time Even if I don't make the recipe, I'm always open-minded to picking up a new tip or two. I'll get through my shows, one weekend at a time!
In a large bowl combine eggs, bourbon, vanilla, and salt. Mix well. Slowly pour sugar mixture into egg mixture, whisking constantly. Stir in chocolate chips and pecans. Pour mixture into pie shell.
The colouring ain't good and I feel I threw too much at the card but, it was made with a lot of thought, and a blindfold! Plus, it's kinda cute - even if that mouse is dicing with death and I'm not sure about the little pink pearls!
Why Me?
Save these people, save the teenage girl 2000 years from now who just broke up with her boyfriend, save that guy 1000 years from now who committed murder. Save the world. All BILLIONS of people, and the only condition? Was for people to admit and believe that God loves them? That God sent HIS only Kid to take THEIR place? To die, for everyone?
this much crack in my life from both young and old. I don’t see the logic of wearing hip hugging pants
I decided to let The Brother take the TV without a fight, but I did go out and buy a newer, better TV before relinquishing the old one. I also made The Brother carry my new TV into my apartment for me before he carried the old TV out. It felt great.
Terry Barfoot
Hi lee
I recently had the opportunity to review a set of Get Ripped exercise dvds by Jari Love. The critically acclaimed Get Ripped series enables individuals to burn up to three times more calories than the traditional weight-training program, and has received rave reviews from fitness critics throughout North America since the first title debuted in late 2005.
Animal Collective - Sung Tongs - 2004
Agnes was born in France but when her mother died the family moved to the U.S. At age 16, this impetuous young woman married a circus clown. She and her husband, Bill Lake, toured with the circus for thirteen years. Her specialties were tightrope walking, lion taming and trick riding. In 1869, her husband was shot to death while trying to aprehend a man who was sneaking into the circus. The gutsy Agnes took over management of the circus and it continued to tour.
Today we are giving you guys a peek at our final stamp set and die. Many of you have been requesting another follow-up set to the popular A Pocketful series, and today, it is my pleasure to introduce:
KEEP THE VISION!
Since the Birch Bay Road Race 30K two weeks ago I have had two good weeks. I feel like I am making some real progress toward rediscovering my spring speed. I don't know that I will recover as much of it as I would like before Eugene, but that's okay. We'll see what my two weeks of "sharpening" will do as I taper.
Random factoid: WHY is there information out there that grapefruits can cause cancer? I hate you, Internet. I refuse to let that little worm get into my brain.
But I thought I would also take this time to share a few thoughts, as raw as they are, I need to get them off my chest.
I'll manage my way with a clear head, two amazing babies, and a husband who loves me enough to bring home some chocolate.
The third component of "what we do" is the project as a whole (the entire film, TV show, video game or whatever) and our satisfaction or disappointment with how it turns out.
the password is "sydney".
The Nicene Creed is slightly older than the Niceno-Constantinopolitan Creed, and the Apostles’ Creed is older still. However, they, like the Niceno-Constantinopolitan, declare inaccurate and non-essential doctrine to be essential for true Christianity. Namely, the Nicene Creed includes the homoousion, and the Apostles’ Creed includes Jesus’ being divinely conceived and the Virgin Birth. Thus, it too must be rejected in their traditional form; however, I will re-visit these two creeds shortly to see if they can be salvaged.
So whether he was hoping to nip off to Narnia for a bit, or just continue the hockey game, Tevye went in search of the ball. A few minutes later, a faint call could be heard drifting up the steps, informing both Saarah and myself that the ball was not to be found. So the two of us went down to help in the search.
There are, of course, zillions of other cocktails that are perfectly suited to making at home - the naffly named but delicious Flirtini for one, and the mis-named but easy-drinking French Martini for another. The cocktail I most often claim I want to drink is a Hemlocktini - invented by the lovely Waffle and I as an elegant solution to extreme situations - but since a martini glass rinsed with hemlock and filled with iced vodka would be as toxic as it sounds, it's just as well the Hemlocktini exists only as a metaphor.
Then it was lunch and we saved some cash on the grill so we used it for a lunch at Momoyas, a Japanese place near out house. I had steak and shrimp, Bobina rocked some chicken and shrimp.
‘In 2008 and 2010, Schock’s campaign reimbursed his mother, Janice Knapp, $23,711′.
~TV/Radio personality Grace Lee on President Aquino
Intervention Details:
2. Israel will live in the land of her inheritance
Roll out the pastry on floured board into 14 in circle. Transfer them onto baking sheet. Heat the oven @ 190C.
Just one person, with a negative attitude and a grudge to bear at their work place, can effectively cause a work slow down. The ramifications are significant and all because of one worker who ran their mouth constantly about how they hated their job or what an unfair performance review they have received. Keep your eyes out for these trouble-makers and nip it in the bud if you hear or see someone expounding their negativity. If possible, eliminate the person from your work place and do damage control as soon as you are aware of this type of behavior.
straight yellow ribbon
2 cups shredded sharp cheddar cheese
· Exceptional Parent Magazine- Maxwell J. Schiffer Award 2005
we then spent the day as any red blooded Australian would. So, of course you know what we did right? Its obvious really.
what is my purpose right now? what is the core of what i need
As a part of our project for 2NE1′s 3rd Anniversary, we have planned to send CL a messagebook which will incorporate 52 Reasons why we think CL is perfectly gorgeous and breathtakingly beautiful just the way she is.
We had a nice chat and I took a couple of pictures of her, trying to catch the moment when her hyperactive puppy would pop up over her shoulder. You can see that she’s pointing at my business card on the desk, a detail that I’ve only noticed once I’ve scanned the picture.
DR EVIL: Thanks doc, but over your shoulder I can see a very sleek Cadillac Eldorado pulling in so…
I love having them next door, and am trying to convince them to buy that house!! LeaAnn and I have started working out together and are making plans on how to keep our kids busy this summer so that they don't drive us crazy :) Not to mention the times we invaded to use their bathroom when ours were out of commission!
I use gmail as mail server. I have 2 gmail accounts (one personal one for business).
Fellow bloggers, et al. I cracked a rib when my feet went flying out from under me in an icy parking lot. Thus, not much writing for a few days. No time crunch. No pun. See you after the thaw, on the other side of “feeling better.”
It took a few seconds, but I soon spotted the flame. At the far end of the production platform, behind the fire wall, was the glycol unit, which dried the gas from the well adjacent to the production platform. The fumes from the process vented through a stack, which now had a ten foot flame on the top. I made some inane comment, like "We have a fire.", which caused a group of spectators to gather at the windows to view the event. Since I was supposed to be working, I went to my locker, put on my slicker, went out the door and down the stairs.
Enough of my rant, I have some figuring out to do with all my pictures.
It was nice to see the pictures of Fred and George and Hugo again. I miss them.
Riddle Question: Why did the silly gardener plant a light bulb?
But, having my husband voluntarily give up his basketball game to go with me and be my assistant and driver, was the best part of the whole experience!
Two weeks from that Thursday would be Thanksgiving.
Our grandfather would be proud.
I realise it is much easier said than done but surely increasing class sizes cannot be the only solution to alleviating the cost of educating extra pupils?
Hong Kong can be a really crazy place to visit (as well as live) and sometimes the crowds and general pandemonium can get to you. What most people who visit HK don’t know is that the city has a number of lovely and almost tranquil plaves where you can take some time out from the city. Here are a few of my favourite city escapes:
If you love Beth Devine Designs as much as I do you will be so happy to hear that there will be a giveaway soon! Look out for that! =)
Finding 100 buyers for your book is just the tip of the iceberg. Since the general statistics state only 1-3% are willing to purchase a book from or by you, that means you need to have at a minimum 1000 ‘personal’ friends, family members, co-workers, local townspeople, public figures, etc. who know you are a writer, support what you’re doing and will actually fork over $17-$30 to buy a hardback book (if you publish traditionally). And those 100 need to be people who will tell at least another 50-100 people about you and your book, and recommend both highly. That assumes that the original 100 will read your book and actually like it enough to tell others too. When I say telling others, that might include writing a book review on Amazon.com, for instance. It also might include tweeting about you and your book too.
At the end of the day, after all that non-obsessing about Mr. Zegna and whether or not to call Mr. Lead Singer Man (who I may call yet), Mr. Valdez falls into my lap. And my lap likes it (don’t be dirty). So that, my friends, is how I met Mr. Valdez, AKA Mr. Zegna from El Salvador. Which brings me to my question of the day: Do you ever feel like you’re living in a f’d up Taster’s Choice commercial? Because sometimes I feel like I am.
Yummy food you make: Russian Fudge
Syrin came up with his daggers and started his nightly ritual.
Despite the lack of depth
children.
But, I am SO happy that I have discovered Paper Coterie and all things great!
There's something off about the girl. Something.... medically perhaps? It's hinted at in the trailer. Perhaps she was "created" by Blanchett's character and Bana, feeling sorry for the child, stole her away to keep her safe. I don't know. I'm sure that the twist at the end will reveal all and devastate poor, creepy Hanna. And she is creepy. Just watch the trailer. Anyway, this one seems to be a thriller, action, spy flick. I adore Cate Blanchett. She always makes the most interesting choices, and they are almost all watchable and enjoyable. I am turned off by the main character, Hanna, though, so I'm debating on whether or not to catch this one in theaters. Blanchett just might reel me in though, so we'll see. I predict this one will be a 3.5 or a 4 out of 5.
And then there was the competition to say what Farantella's real name was. Surprisingly, there were only two entries to this. And, amusingly, the entries were from Isla and her mother, Clare! They both got the right answer - Doreen - so I had to choose which of their reasons for picking them I liked better. I liked them both a lot because they were witty and very nice to me, but I chose Clare, simply because I couldn't have her being beaten by her daughter AGAIN!
Anyone got anything good I could use to get these people off my back?
For now, bye bye.
Linda and I waited. It had been a long and exhausting day at Princes Margaret Hospital. A day of concern and support and additional testing. A day of confirming, once again, the power of reality over hearsay.
To this beautiful soundtrack comes a brilliantly structured short film. In my writing nowadays I think increasingly about structure and it’s remarkable how you can fit the standard elements of a traditional feature film into a one-minute commercial.
Early pregnancy
Thanks from Susan Marlowe CPA!
We were heading excitedly down the path at the park. My two two-year olds were running with excitement. Well, I should say, one of them was. My son kept tripping a little every few feet. He has taken a liking lately to his older sister's Crocs. I'm not sure if it's the bright yellow and orange that fascinate him, or the feeling of wearing big kid shoes. Whatever the case, he loves to wear these out. We let him do so around home or if we're headed somewhere he won't be doing a lot of walking, since they are about 3 sizes too big.
This type of kelp is also used to rid the body of and keep it from absorbing harmful chemicals, toxins, carcinogens, and such heavy metal pollutants as barium and cadmium.
Everyone was organized and friendly from the start. Wild Hares Racing put on a fantastic race. I found a SUPER nice group of friends at the start. They’d asked me to take their picture, and I socially latched on as payment. I tried to keep the pre-race spazzing under control as I found comfort in chatting with a very pretty girl who was also running trails for the first time.
I've explained before that the Northern Soul scene in the seventies became an incredibly broad church with some niteries (not least the Wigan Casino) adopting songs which were closer in style to uptempo mod-styled sixties floor-fillers than soul as such. In the same manner that the great hunt for the next buried "psychedelic" record has led us to describe some very bubblegum discs as being "popsike", the desperation for new nuggets in a heavily mined genre led to similar behaviour with old soul music in the seventies. The numerous snide YouTube comments under videos of tracks describing themselves as "Northern Soul" these days points towards the fact that a great many punters were disgruntled by this activity (and remain so) but it didn't seem to hurt ticket sales for the nights at the time.
Modeling behavior for my son is one of the most important ‘jobs’ that as a father I have. It is not only in the way that I treat others, care for myself and my environment, but how I interact with him.
guttural growl.
8 seconds
Tricky.
Why don’t they ask him what his position on Hamas is?
I read for weeks until one day, a picture popped in my mind of a beautiful old house with wide porches, brightly lit at night. Music, laughter and lively conversation carried onto the porch where I stood in the dark, peeking in. I saw a feast and a fire on the hearth, much like the Christmas open houses from my childhood, with one important difference. There was a Father here whose face mirrored love and warmth at His children’s presence. This was God's family, and I desperately wanted to be inside. But how?
Steve Rogers is chosen because he is an underdog with integrity. Dr. Erskine tells Steve “why did I choose someone weak? Because a weak man knows the value of strength, the value of power. And he also knows compassion.” Erskine also explains that the Super Soldier Serum enhances everything that is within a man. Because of his integrity and heroism, Steve Rogers becomes the iconic Captain America. But this same serum also transformed power-hungry Nazi Johann Schmidt (Hugo Weaving) into the villainous Red Skull. It is this reason that Dr. Erskine makes Steve promise that no matter what, “you will stay who you are. Not a perfect soldier, but a good man.”
...have taken a liking to photography. I shoot Nikon but may get a Canon Mark II. We'll see.
All recollection of GCSE History seems to have evaporated into the ether but I do remember A-Level History classes with some clarity. Every lesson followed precisely the same format: the teacher entered the classroom, perched on the edge of the desk, took out her notes and ... dictated. I was a new girl – my father had got a promotion and the move meant I had to enter the sixth form at the beginning of the spring term. At first I thought that my history teacher would presently get to the end of her notes, and then, perhaps, we could go on to discuss and debate – or at least have a break from the interminable dictation. But no. This was her pedagogic method, and it had more than a whiff of anaesthetic about it. Nothing sank in. English that is spoken slowly enough to be taken down in longhand, with added punctuation, quickly transforms into abstract sounds, the verbal equivalent of those lava lamps so fashionable at the time. King James, comma, anxious to placate Parliament, comma, turned, comma, inevitably, comma, to Robert C–E-C-I-L for advice, and make sure you’ve spelt advice with a ‘c’. As the school bell rang, the dictation would stop, and I would wake up, not quite sure where I’d been. The technique deadened my intellectual curiosity; it attacked the fierce belief in education my parents had tried to instil in me.
I used Simple Things and the custom Die Cut to cut it out, and the Honeycomb Background. I stamped my images with Memento and colored with Copics. I stamped the sentiment with VersaColor. I used Cheery Lynn Fanciful Flourish Die to cut my vines, and Spellbinder's Labels 21 and Fleur de Lis Accents to frame the sentiment. My base is Bazzill, and the white is Gina K Pure Luxury heavy weight. I embossed the Honeycomb bg with T Holtz Distress Embossing Powder in Antique Linen. I kept the card flat and mailable with only some tiny pearls added to the corners.
Marimuthu was appointed as a “contact person” in the CIU and paid R50 000 a month.
What do you think of when you hear these words~Flushy,Trashy and Stinky? If you thought of a
Finally it came time to board the EXTREMELY SMALL plane. Like, I could not stand up straight small. 30 people max small. I wedged myself into my seat (aisle, ALWAYS aisle) and congratulated my self on having an empty seat next to me.
Hudson Motor Company stock fluctuated widely around noon yesterday and losses estimated at $500,000 to $1,000,000 were suffered as a result of the widespread flotation of false news regarding dividend action. The directors met in Detroit at 12:30, New York time, to act on a dividend. Almost immediately a false report that only the regular dividend had been declared was circulated. At 12:46 the Dow, Jones & Co. ticker service received the report from the Stock Exchange firm and its publication resulted in further drop in the stock. Shortly after 1 o'clock the ticker services received official news that the dividend had been increased and a 20 per cent stock distribution authorized. They rushed the correct news out on their tickers and Hudson stock immediately jumped more than 6 points.
If you’re part of the real estate armageddon set, you’ll get a kick out of the Calera legalese. For all those who find “pleasure” in lawsuits against deadbeat pre-sale buyers, you’ll enjoy this background on the mortgage promo:
WordPress is the essential for mobile blogging. The app has everything that you need to blog straight from your phone. You can post photos, videos or just a normal blog post. It’s a great app and I enjoyed using it.
Three years of not being sick. Three years of opportunity to practice gratitude.
We were drawn to you
GM sold just 7,671 Volts last year, below its goal of 10,000. But in March, it set a new monthly record of 2,289 for the Volt, an electric car with a small backup gas engine. All-electric Leaf sales nearly doubled to 579.
Like I mentioned in my previous post (Remember the late night Kadala Muttai?), I woke up one fine day with the thought of having the Empire kababs. Now where in Minnesota will I ever get it? Who in Minneapolis can make it for me? No one! I ate Jobin's brains,vented out on Facebook but nothing helped. So the hunt began...now you know where my hunt can lead me to! EMPIRE KABABS!!!! :-)
It was never a matter of "Hey, I'm Dick Clark. Isn't this a bit of a comedown for me?"
On the upside, it’ll make leaving here just a bit easier.
3. Discipline. I started telling Zealand weeks before we started school that "His teacher wouldn't like that...or this" often. Not that I wanted to use his future teacher as a tool or lever but to make sure that he comprehended that he was to have guidelines and rules. Being that Zealand has never been under the care of anyone but family, rules is something new to him. Zealand has an aversion to the word "No" to a humiliating fault.... something we are working on, as we tend to not use the word in our home.
Basic Grey paper..Porcelain collection (from at least last year!)
Seth: Cool, me neither. I'm gonna go watch some hockey.
The enthusiastic reviews by Europeans given above are typical and more like that are easy to find. For instance, here is du Tertre, as mentioned in the introduction to the post:
Actually, another blogger on my blogroll posted a link to an author of YA books, and a Mother needing help. It seems she's had a string of bad luck starting with a troubled birth of her last child. It went downhill from there with the loss of her job, and a screwed up payment system.
*Note, The X-Men do not appear in the “Marvel Cinimatic Universe” of films ( Iron Man, Incredible Hulk, Thor, Captain America and The Avengers). The film rights to these characters are owned by 20th Century Fox, while the heroes comprising the Avengers belong to Disney/Marvel Studios. However due to their prominence in the Marvel Universe, the fact that the X-Men movies helped reignite the superhero film genre ( along with the first Sam Raimi Spider-Man movie), and the current Avengers vs. X-Men story-arc in the comic books, I felt that they deserved their time in the sun.
He was inches away, his voice barely above a whisper. “No matter what I find in that file, I want you to know…you have given me…well… you helped me find me again, and I’ll never forget it.”
85. I am still looking for a prom dress too Kami!! Hmm...if only I would have kept the pretty emerald green one your Aunt made me. Ya, right...like I would really fit into it!
Chris Jericho made his way to the ring to kick off what would be the first match of this week’s episode. His opponent, Kofi Kingston, came out to an energetic crowd and was looking to get a win over Jericho. As the match progressed, the more intense it became. Jericho and Kofi were putting it all on the line, but one high-risk maneuver from Kofi led to a code breaker to the face from Jericho. Jericho picked up the win, but he wasn’t done just yet. Jericho picked up a mic and scolded Punk and the audience while telling CM Punk that he had a special gift for him. Jericho didn’t say what the contents of the gift were, but that we would find out later on in the night.
11. Song Of Wandering Aengus
Funny and biting, honest and poignant, this no-holds-barred collection gives an in-depth look into the life of one of today’s most influential comic voices. In writing about her childhood longing to be a priest, her role in developing The Daily Show, and of her often problematic habit of diving into everything head first, asking questions later (resulting in multiple rescue-dog adoptions and travel disasters), Lizz Winstead has tapped an outrageous and heartfelt vein of the all-too-human comedy.
Just a quick little note...stay tuned to Bird is the Word...we have a few EXCITING things coming this direction......!!!!
Thanking you,
This sounds so depressing I think I need to stop writing. Nobody likes bad news and my endless whining.
I've been maintaining my sanity by trying to get in at least five hikes up and down the forty-eight Atrium steps each day. Yup. One before and after breakfast, one before and after lunch, and at least one other random trip. I can now get up from a squat without any problem LOL.
There is room for the worst sinners.
viewed the exam results few days ago, all passed. not with flying color, but 2B and 4C for 6 modules should be not bad since I never aims for distinction.
91. Gary Ritchie-Hum, Sing Repeat! (Fancy Two Tone)
Whether the licence is exclusive or non-exclusive and whether it allows sublicensing or not.
Gramps was 91, and had been failing ever since spring. He last looked like himself eighty-one days ago.
remedial classes - Last term during finals, a student was on her way to school to study math with her friends. I offered some help, and I taught them probability. They understood 25%. That's 0.25.
One of the other members designed this. All five bloggers are represented in the picture (I am the cheese), and obviously this took a little more effort and is better than my design. I suppose. However, I have one small suggestion . . .
Office 561-630-2021
Director : James A. Contner
Please see the buyer reviews of IOGEAR 16-Port Integrated KVM Console with 17 Inch TFT LCD Active Matrix Monitor, Keyboard and Touchpad GCL1816 (Black) from the merchant’s site by click on the link below.
Dip the ice cream sandwiches halfway lengthwise in melted chocolate; coat chocolate with sprinkles.
away from it all”) and a few vague scenes in mind. The story started to go somewhere even though I often had no idea what would come out of my fingers as I sat at the typewriter. A woman I’d seen at the supermarket turned up as a character in the story, and typewriters turned out to play a major role (I guess that was predictable). Finally it all came together in a Hollywoodish
( and paper I had laying around for awhile)
ABC concluded no tastings would be authorized for party or smoke shops, parking lots, sidewalks or alleys adjacent to liquor store property. The zone of prohibition extended in front, behind, above, below and to sides of stores, officials said.
Biodiversity is down. We consume more resources each year than can be replaced in a year. It takes 1.5 years to replace what we use in 1 year. That's the bad news, and it just gets worse.
Porsche sets great store by very high service standards that are the same the world over. The sports car manufacturer isn’t just constantly raising the quality and thoroughness of its repair and maintenance standards through continuous improvement processes but also optimises the call on its customers’ time to their advantage – from the making of the appointment to receipt of the vehicle to its return.
You end up with cookie-cutter creatives coming in from the same ad courses, with the same books, the same way of thinking, and the same teaching. And you end up with legions of planners and account people who are uniform in their thinking, or their life experience. It's not a recipe for a diverse and excitingly dangerous melting pot of people. And that's what advertising has had at its best. And what it needs for the future.
It's funny to see the writing turn out this way, because I am understanding more and more why some authors personify their work. I have one author-friend on Facebook who is always saying how cranky her novel is and I think it's hilarious, but really, when you think about it, a novel really is like a spoiled child that shrieks and makes your life miserable if he/she doesn't have his/her way.
Now, if I hadn’t been feeling so invincible and hadn’t leaped into a jump far beyond my reach, I’d probably be able to walk without a limp for the rest of my life, or at least the week. But what would I have learned by being timid. Yes, I landed the jump wrong, I twisted my ankle but now at least I know how to land that same jump right next time. Who knows, maybe next time I’ll be able to jump even higher, if I only have the courage to do so.
The Toyota Prius c also carries on the family tradition of being incredibly fuel efficient. Rated by the American EPA at 3.5l/100km in the city, 4.0l/100km on the highway, and 3.7l/100km combined. For those that worry that this B-segment car is cramped inside, it is not. Front seat passengers have plenty of room, no fear of rubbing shoulders with your passenger. For back seat passengers, two normal sized adults will be able to ride comfortably. We had the drivers seat set for us at 5’11”, then jumped in the back seat behind and were able to get in and out with no problem, and our knees were not touching the back of the driver seat either.
Salted caramel has been somewhat of a trendy flavor lately, and so when I spotted these cupcakes on Pinterest, I had to give them a try. I was so pleased with the way they came out and although they have quite a few steps, the end result is totally worth it.
The flight from Atlanta to Amsterdam (our point of European departure for Africa) was largely uneventful. 8.5 hours of flight broken only for about a half hour by turbulence in the mid-Atlantic.
Since both Equivio and Relativity sponsor the work of the eDisclosure Information Project, I am necessarily interested in reports of their big sales. I do not, however, write about every success on the part of those who fund what I do because they, as well as I, value my readership and know that we would soon drive it away if all that you found here was lists of buyers. That function is ably served by others, and I am spared having to decide, for example, whether this sale is worth reporting where that one was not, quite apart from considerations like having only a finite number of hours in a week.
All Happy Toy Machine plush are made here in the USA! Regular-size toys (10-15 inches tall) are $29.99 and large-size toys (24-30 inches tall) are $49.99. This includes any body parts, shapes, or colors you choose for your toy, and any embroidered features (eyes, nose, mouth, etc.) and decorations that you want to put on your toy - these are all included in the price. They currently ship in the US. Shipping prices vary depending on your location and size of order.
However when we landed in Denmark and the economy tanked all our plans kind of went out the window and we found ourselves in a strange house, in a strange land with no income and with all the barriers of not speaking the language. I remember feeling really low at one point, really hoping this economic crisis would spark a domino effect that would put an end to the whole corrupt monitory system by making it crash worldwide, putting everyone back to zero if I can quote the movie Fight Club.
my partner and I would take the two person elevator
The Russian Orthodox Greek Catholic Church in America, which was renamed the Orthodox Church of America in 1970, declared itself autonomous at a time when the Russian Orthodox Church in Russia was experiencing serious persecution at the hands of the Bolshevik government and was struggling for its survival. In 1920 Patriarch Tikhon of Moscow directed all Russian Orthodox churches outside of Russia to govern themselves autonomously if the central administration were disabled or if they were unable to contact it. The ROGCCA declared itself autonomous without the necessary condition of the inability of the central administration to govern them. The Russian Orthodoc Church did not actually grant autocephaly to the OCA until 1970. All autocephalous Orthodox Churches , however, do not recognize the atocephaly of the OCA.
Adults must respect the privacy of children and youth, but safety concerns will at times have to override privacy issues. Tell your children you may review their online communications when you think it is necessary to do so.
If I could pick a star for you, I’d lay it in your lap,
In a completely impersonal way, the wand excites the nerves as well as anything probably could. If I had more time, I could probably make myself come with the shower head alone but I lean back against the tile and point the shower wand at my cock while I stroke myself and think about kissing L one time outside Sandy and Dave’s when there were lots of friends waiting inside, and for a moment I rested my hand on her hip and to this day, I regret the fact that I only thought about it, but didn’t drag her by the waistband of her jeans into the dark carport and fuck her over the hood of Sandy’s Chevy Volt.
"Do you ever use Hess?"
I like wheelbarrows because they're simple and ancient and still widely used. They are a combination of a three-wheeled stool and a wheel, with handles, and that's pretty elegant, historically and mechanically.
We've also saved money during the past year, because some of the items I mentioned won't be paid until after we've started traveling. So in order to have money to get everything booked, we are using money out of our savings and reimbursing ourselves when the bonuses, security deposit, and retirement money come through.
Very Good Soundboard Recording Remastered By Captain Acid
NEW INTERFACE
The point, he said, are we aware of this? Civil Engineering is very business-like engineering branch. The students should be aware. Even more the practicing engineers (and academics). If this monstrous elephant slips our radar, we are in lost.
Who they became after your teen years began will probably not matter as much in understanding yourself. You were dialed into your behaviors and patterns by then.
Stay strong and keep caring.
“Its okay, it’s a tough ride up there, I’m surprised more of you don’t stop. But then frankly, I’m surprised you all do this at all.”
Start with the 1 year goals. Identify what beliefs have limited you from achieving these goals to date. Is it that you believe that by going for the goals you will not have enough time for yourself or your family? Do you believe that you will loose love if you try and achieve them? What are the limiting beliefs? And be honest with your self. Next, ask yourself “What would I have to believe for my limiting belief to be un-true?” For example, if one of your limiting beliefs is that by working on the achievement of your goal you won’t have enough time for your family, then, a more empowering belief would be “there is more than enough time to balance between myself, my family and my goals” or if your limiting belief is that by working on the goal you will loose love from someone, in which case, a more empowering belief would be “by achieving (goal) the relationship between me and (person) will grow stronger than ever before!”. Can you see where we are going with this?
Went out the next day and bought them. Read two in quick succession. Like a pint of Guinness with a Jameson chaser. They went down okay, but afterwards there was a thought that maybe it wasn't such a good idea.
I will be posting a newly written romance story – part satire, part drama – alongside what chapters I wrote of Dragon Air during Nanowrimo. Dragon Air is undergoing a severe unpheaval, and almost none, if any, of the scenes that are posted there will be kept in the next draft. But still, I figured I might as well put it out there. : ) Though beware – the writing is stressed and the pacing is ridiculous. I’ll try and fill in the holes that I missed.
BF: It’s possible. But generally, they would rather get a bunch of generals than hockey players.
E' stata una bella passegiata.
remove the spring form part of the pan and place the bottom on your counter.
I know I wrote this at the end of the last vid, but I just really wanna say that one of the things I like about Hyun Joong is the surprising maturity of the words he says, which impresses me and motivates me as well to do even better in my own career.
a pat on the back, and a shelf full of awards I stuffed into a suitcase that
-- Mommy was peeved at Jonah for talking back to her one day. So she told him so. His response, " (*SIGH*) Mom. I am not talking backwards. I'm talking English."
Base is the database front-end of the LibreOffice suite.
MATTHEW: My story, “The Witch Hole,” is a Vault of Horror-type tale that takes place in Lakota Sioux territory of the Black Hills, in the mid-19th century. It plays with Sioux mythology and shamanism, blaming all manner of aberrant behavior on a freaky little creature living deep beneath the surface of the earth, a creature that’s been there far longer than have native tribes, let alone white European settlers….
Parents of one SK candidates even pawn some areas of their farms to raise P60,000 purposely for the elections. No wonder, SK voters were given some P500 to P1,000 each.
Or a couple...Now it won't let me chose pictures from my files the way it used to, in a group. It goes to cloud picker then tells me there is an error. I should be able to go to my own files...So I changed it to the old format and I can pick one picture at a time...
tat te karma pravakṣyāmi
Ribbon & flower from my stash
2 resembled
In our last episode of Falcone’s Great Outdoors, we saw our hero reveling in a resurrected redbud sapling before romanticizing the irony of a neighboring stalk of poison ivy.
Good line, Ms. Peters!
“The governments of the present day have to deal not merely with other governments, with emperors, kings and ministers, but also with the secret societies which have everywhere their unscrupulous agents, and can at the last moment upset all the governments’ plans.”
Why is it OK for people to tell you what they think you are doing wrong, what you need to change and in a rude way on top of it all, when not even asked.
The report looks at the estimated cost and expected resale return of 35 midrange and upscale remodeling projects in 80 markets. The estimated costs and returns were derived from a survey of more than 3,000 REALTORS® conducted last summer. As in past years, REALTORS® picked exterior projects to recoup the most at resale. Among those, new fiber-cement siding was expected to provide the highest return, recouping an estimated 78 percent of the $13,461 cost.
2 Moonlight Dancin' on the Bayou 5:08
Here, respondent, fully aware that there is a pending court order for the submission of a compromise agreement, should have taken pains to remind complainant about it and ascertain the true intent of the latter regarding the same, so that he, as complainant’s counsel, can make the necessary legal action in order for the case not to be unduly delayed and appear not to be indefinitely pending in the docket of the court concerned.
AAAaaaaahhhh ~ and here we have "The Kidnapper" from Aronzi Aronzo's The Cute Book!! Bet you can't even GUESS who made him! Yup, that's right, the 13 yr.old son who decided he really HATES the sewing machine. I did have final pity on him, though, & let him hand-stitch the head & the hat.....much mmuuuuuucchh better. (He does not love this home ec course for homeschool particularly overmuch....however, he WILL appreciate any future wife's attempts from here on out, I am certain. ;-D)
Listen to the song. Tell in the comment box what you think about the song — what does the music make you think of? What instruments do you hear? Would you listen to it again? Remember, your comments are 5 of your 25 points — make sure to answer the questions!
Althought fiber might benefit some cats with diarrhea, constipation, and more generally IBD, healthy cats don’t need bulking agents in their diets. However, some scientific evidence shows soluble fiber’s binding action slows down the body glucose absorption, stabilizing blood glucose levels. Moderation is the key, even when fiber might be medically warranted, such as for diabetic cats.
Of course the friend says she totally dropped the stuff off. And now vitamin*-nemesis has gone from "I swear I'll talk to her" to avoiding my calls and texts. And she still owes me the rest of my thingies back.
"Dude, like I said. I've seen you there TONS of times."
And I’m not entirely sure how to stop.
3 tablespoons butter
Transitions Optical is doing great things within our community. In addition to their website created to promote healthy vision practices for children, they have also partnered with American Diabetes Association (ADA) to offer free vision screenings at the ADA Health Expos in Chicago & New York.
The road racing stage will be domestic (u.s.-based), and will also include transitioning
It’s no overstatement to suggest that many Irish-Americans were as interested in the troubles in the North of Ireland as most residents of the Irish Republic.
It's something daring, the Covenantal
fell in love with Watson when he first met him a year ago.
I love his voice
Good beer. Wish I'd had a warning about the scotch, but it's pretty good nonetheless.
556
-meeting up with her friends at their school during lunch
3 creating
What could huge multi-national corporations do if they wanted to do something? Our Supreme Court considers them "individuals" paving the route of the "super pacs" and contributions of millions of dollars for their political agendas. We see very slick ads on television and don't even know who is paying for them. Billions of dollars and they remain anonymous! Our privacy is diminished every day. Every keystroke is recorded. There are things they want us to know. They want to manipulate our emotions, control us in every conceivable way, who we vote for and what we buy.
Yes, upright straighten sure the adornment is unpolluted superlative ribbon, not plated with metal. Justified Rhodium plated sterling conductor jewelry sometimes contains a fiver place between the grayness and the rhodium to act as an resiny. Hence, buy exclusive eminent shining superior grey adornment if you are supersensitive to fiver.
I like to think of myself as a fairly accomplished baker. Breads, cakes...it doesn't really matter what it is, I know I can make it.
4, In so far as the persons serving in the Indian Audit and Account Department are concerned, these orders are issued in consultation with the Comptroller & Auditor General of India.
If you drove through Nicasio, California, praying with eyes closed-tight, you might miss seeing Old Saint Mary's. Otherwise, you've got no excuse to miss framing up a little composition with camera or your mind's-eye.
Quobna Ottobah Cugoano was kidnapped by slave traders when he was 13 years-old in Africa in the late 1700s and taken to England. (His slave name was John Stuart.) After experiencing much cruelty and suffering, he finally got his freedom and learned to read and write.
Mara has been an editor at Walker Books since 1983 and claims to be part of the furniture but she's far too lively and creative to be that wooden. As well as being a brilliant editor, she is a widely published poet and an award winning picture book writer. Her latest 'Oliver' book is, 'Oliver and the Noisy Baby'. ' Her next book is 'Snip Snap, Look Who's Back!' and is out in February 2012. Phew!
And surely we can change, surely we can change
“Book of Mormon Stories”
I gave up beer, for a short time. I went days without a beer and even started working out. That didn't last long. After some encouraging words of advice from my beer buddies, Michael and the Beer Buddah, I started up again.
Levack chose what he perceived as the natural choice for an established author with a readership. His fourth novel, Tribute of Death was published through Lulu in 2008. We have already seen this year John Edgar Wideman pursue a similar path to publication in an effort to continue to make their books available. For these authors, this is perhaps the nub of why an established author chooses to use a publishing service, rather than continue to wait for another mainstream opportunity.
You might think that those similarities might lessen your enjoyment, but it wasn't the case for me. There are so much more in the story which you'll be excited to read about. It's so entertaining and very hard to put down. I enjoyed every minute of it, from the beginning up to the last page. There is no dull moment, only exciting ones. There is no cliff-hanger ending but it ended in such a way that you'll want and need the next book. With nothing to hate but so much to love and enjoy, you'll definitely don't want to miss it. It's one of the best book out there that I won't ever hesitate to recommend. You must read it!
The size alone is ideal for bringing it to the beach or restaurant. When not using the camera, the slide cover gives good protection for the camera lens and the screen display is clear. The camera features a great 25mm wide-angle lens. The videos it records are, unlike many point and shoot cameras, 1080i videos at 60 frames per second, rather than 30 frames per second. On a huge flat screen television, the video images appear almost life like. It seems to have a pretty solid waterproofing, which is appealing.
I am not doing this experience for glory, popularity, notoriety or believing it is any more important than what someone else does with their days. Actually I don’t like being thought of as dedicated or inspirational or more important than anyone else.
The chapters selected by Libcom are the final three from the 1952 edition. Note the episode in Chapter 15 in which Denby—at a public meeting—asks novelist and CP member Howard Fast, “What is the relationship of the Russian workers to production?”
so let the record show, Effexor kicked ass in the third week, got me talking to people, telling jokes, on the phone and off my computer, playing with kids, looking up at the sky above, cornbread moon and twinkly stars, take that, assholes! all very banal and run-of-the-mill, a mood elevator doing what it was designed to do, someone better call Ripley. But I dreaded the outcry — Placebo effect!– Uh huh, and it only took 32 trials with prior “placebos” til Effexor hit the sweet spot, what a mystery these dadgum sugar pills, 31 fakes til the real placebo kicks in.
Ooi also condemned Home Minister Hishammuddin Hussein, saying the letter of reprimand was merely a slap on the wrist when Utusan was flaming ‘dangerous fires’.
(The world O Libertad, that vainly conspired against thee,)
But nothing about the National Broadband Plan white paper is about the best and most efficient use of the spectrum, or it would have addressed… receiver standards. When broadcasters were told to carry high-definition video in 6 MHz of bandwidth, it was impossible. Now they can do it in 2 MHz. Because of innovation. Innovation born of no choice, but innovation, nonetheless.
There is an appetite for movies for & by African-Americans, & that hunger is not currently being met. People would love to see characters on the Big Screen that they can relate to. Thankfully for all of you The Best Man fans there is allegedly a sequel in the makes. Although its 13 years over due, fans will surely appreciate it. I’m excited for its return to the Silver Screen & can not wait for its’ premiere. Universal Studios demanded Malcolm D. Lee (the creator of the original movie) to write & direct the sequel The Best Man 2.
Already the spineless and gutless British are exporting their citizens to face American "justice", years behind bard in second world, extremely violent US penal systems. For what? For committing no crime in the UK, but a crime in America on the Internet. Can the British get anymore pathetic? Why surely they can. Read and be amazed.
The point is to settle more fully into physical experience and live fully and sensually in the moment. On Thursday, the Sun enters the enjoy-the-earth-mode of Taurus and resuscitates the foundational shoring up of the earth grand trine that took place in mid-March. The Taurus New Moon follows on Saturday, in a tight, easy flow to Mars, a tight cooperative link to Neptune and an easy flow to Pluto that will intensify as the Sun and the Moon move apart. (Read more in my mooncast, which will be posted by Friday.)
Taylor (4 years 6 months): Grandpa and Taylor were walking too closely to the bison enclosure in Iowa’s Hickory Hills Park. At one point, the largest of the animals was actually touching the fence. Without warning, the huge animal swung its head, stretching the wire netting and knocking Taylor into the air and several feet away into leaves. Said she, getting up and brushing herself off, “That buffalo’s in big trouble!” (#469)
To spread the word about the way booksellers and librarians serve their communities and assist readers, the participating members will be tweeting and posting messages to blogs and to Facebook about their experiences—before, during (especially) and after the event. This is SinC’s chance to shine a bit of a spotlight on these hardworking—and often unsung—heroes and heroines of our communities.
SD: I like to recommend small businesses because I feel you're more apt to come across unique finds for your wedding that way. Here's a few of my faves:
When the puzzle is done, you will recognize the landscape as your own.
When I was happyish with the background I added some stamping in PaperArtsy Snowflake paint with the flourish from HP1005. Tim's Caged Bird was die cut from Ten Second Studio metal backed onto black cardstock with Humungo Tape and then embossed using a folder. The book page flowers are die cut with the Tattered Florals die.
But I still retain fond memories of the Isles of Shoals -- or at the very least, romantic notions about as foggy as the air around the archipelago itself -- and it’s fun to be reminded of one fine summer by two beers.
46. "Weird Al" Yankovic - Alpocalypse
That's right people. You heard me. LASIK is a piece of cake! The whole thing went down like this...
8:30 – Oh F**K It’ s You - Joanna Garcia/David Walton/Greg Berlanti and Greg Malins comedy (*or maybe Louis CK/Spike Ferestein comedy – I could see any 2 out of the three new comedies mentioned here used somewhere 8:30 or 9:30)
get a TV on top of the grill of a Mercury four door
Do you call your child by every other name in the family but his or her own, the list of names including the dogs, the goldfish, and the neighbor’s cat?
I hope others participate to. It would be great to hear your voices! :)
Congratulations ladies!! Your card are all gorgeous!
I’ve chosen my favourite Top Five school stories inspired in part by the brilliant recent time travel story Beswitched by Kate Saunders, in which 21st century Flora finds herself at a 1930s boarding school. It's funny, clever and there's a lot of feminism smuggled in there too.
TIPS FOR TODAY:
The 16&P recaps are back, ya'll! You can all thank my friend Kira -- she was all, "bitch betta start blogging 16&Pregnant again!" So here I am!
Never Let Me Go is a story of friendship and love, but above all, it is a story of silence, of restraint, and ultimately, of regret. Events unfold slowly, as the characters come to terms with the events from their childhood and their feelings towards each other. Ironically the pervasive silence and lack of action that caused so many of my friends to find the novel boring, are exactly what I enjoyed most about it.
As the FMSI Teller Line Study points out, consumer trends are certainly impacting how we are all interacting with our branches. The real delicate question to ask though is how quickly technology is changing how the population as a whole is interacting with their financial institution? The data from the FMSI Teller Line study points out (a free download at fmsi.com/tellerlinestudy) that this change is and will be very gradual. However, if a financial institution does nothing to address this change, such as changing how they schedule their branches, they will undoubtedly eventually be seriously affected by this shift.
Of course don't forget to share your amazing creations with us and the rest of the world via your blog on Sunday!
The daily mail...
‘It is well for you to come and ask about the seals. And away home with you then, to the mainland.’
So my card for today is pretty easy peazy,used some scraps with Michael's stamps and added a flower and a ribbon. One more for the stash.
11. Getting email in my Yahoo account from an actual person I know and that isn't inviting me to make my penis larger, or to marry a Russian female tractor driver.Neither of which appeals, quite frankly, especially since I don't have a penis. (Or not last time I looked anyway)
Here is my recipe – the dominant spice here is Cayenne pepper, because it provides a good punch of chili heat and not that much other flavour, which the other – what are often called warmer – spices do magnificently. You can include less of the mix in the relish, or change the ratios or even the spices to suit your own taste.
I’m sure there are some people out there that will nit-pick my suggestion and scrutinize their validity. That’s fine so long as you get the message, so long as you appreciate that there things in existence, in your life that fall into these categories. These categories are not absolute but are there to give you perspective.
The other thing about horsetails is that they tend to like very poor soil; seeing that many of them about isn’t a great sign for any gardener, partly because it means spending the next however many years trying to get rid of them and partly because it means that things that could out-compete them just aren’t growing. I’m less worried about the latter: I think the reason the things that could out-compete the horsetails aren’t growing is that they’ve been hacked back or poisoned every few years. Unfortunately all this did was create an environment where the horsetails are very happy indeed!
Nominated, European Film Awards 2000 – Best Film
I have to admit that I love these books
And let me just say that when you are exploring the contents of a trash bag and if you happen to come upon a lot of discarded red velvet cake batter in a hasty manner, your kitchen is poised to look like an episode of Dexter doing what he does best.
We spent most of the rest of the day working on a series of caches on states and state capitals. The terrain was more rugged that we’d anticipated, so we ended up leaving a fair amount to come back for.
However differently human trafficking might be defined basing on the variation of social context from cross time and societies. It is of no doubt that the Palermo protocol laid the foundation of the human trafficking across the globe that most countries blended in their laws forming the basis for operation amongst different actors including Civil Society Organizations in counteracting the phenomenon.
I really hope they sort this out soon. It's a wonderful country, but right now I was very glad to get back to a place where at least I could switch on the heater and get warm food after work :)
But those points can be THE POINT! The point in time where you do a gut check and...hopefully, choose to FIGHT!!!
Speaking to reporters outside Chesterfield police station he said, " I am confident this misunderstanding will be cleared up soon. Bledwina only insisted that I wear a tweed deerstalker decorated with a number of feathers is so that I would fit in in the countryside; I was a little taken aback when she opted for a flak jacket and a tin hat but I respect her sartorial choices."
It’s the decade that the loonie learned to fly. Since bottoming below 62 cents U.S. in January 2002, the Canadian dollar has soared beyond parity with its American counterpart. What’s more, 2011 was the first year since 1976 that our dollar averaged above parity.
With quivering for pleasure’s sake,
The river's flowing strongly till it meets the open sea
Unable to bear the thought of losing his mortal wife, Caden Wolfe
Messing up gives you a valuable opportunity that you won’t get any other way. Messing up gives you the opportunity to show how you deal with messing up. This is vital to earning the trust of people whom you have personally hurt, or who are just afraid you will. You cannot prove to anybody that they can bring their hurt feelings to you and have you be decent about it until you hurt someone’s feelings, so treat it as an opportunity to show the quality of your character. Maybe you didn’t want that opportunity, and maybe nobody else wanted you to get it either, but you’ll inevitably get at least a couple such chances, so use them for all they’re worth. People will notice.
The paw dog – who measures more than 5ft tall on his hind legs – was having a good time trying to imitate his owner's pet kittens.
Full track list:
A majority of the employees here decided to cash in on the extra holiday that we were all given for being kick ass so the office was nice and quiet – giving me plenty of time to 1. stare at the adorable plumber that was fixing our downstairs bathrooms and 2. think about the most pointless shit.
'The last discovery was nevertheless the most shocking to our ears, so much so that the scientists are afraid to continue the project. We tried to listen to the earth's movements at certain intervals with supersensitive microphones, which were let down through the hole. What we heard turned those logically thinking scientists into a trembling ruins. It was a sometimes a weak, but high pitched sound which we thought to be coming from our own equipment,' explained Dr Azzacov.
The tracker’s wounded comrade was making gurgling noises.
When he was given a terminal diagnosis and told he had 2-3 years left, we became even closer than ever before. We talked openly about death and dying. He cried when he got scared and I comforted him. I cried thinking about life without him and he would comfort me and hold me. He assured me that I was a strong woman and that he was so proud of me and that he knew I would be OK. I promised to carry out his last wishes and did just that. He made me promise that I would go on with my life because I was still so young (45 at the time). I didn't want to even think about that but I realized that he needed to hear that from me. It would make it easier for him to deal with his death if he knew he didn't have to worry about me. So I promised and I'm so glad I did. Rich said to me, "Make sure you find a man who treats you well but just remember that no one will ever love you like I do." And I have never doubted that for a second then or now. No one will ever love me that way and I will never love anyone that way again either and it's OK. I feel Rich's love with me every day of my life.
Situated on Pine Cay, an 800-acre private island, this 10,000 square foot home is nestled in a lush landscape framed by an intimate pond. The villa-style residence is one of only a few exclusive residences on the tiny Caribbean island. Each of the home's four bedrooms is housed in a separate pavilion. Located at Amanyara Villas, it has its own private black-volcanic-rock, infinity-edged pool.
And check out the very cool cover, designed by the author, the multi-talented Amy Saia.
I didn’t clap or smile or care when I recognised or reported
I’ve been meaning to write more about the linked article, which was originally published in early December.
I almost forgot to share my latest win. These variety packs came from an Aurifil Facebook giveaway. I guessed that one of their 20 boxes was empty and they sent these as a "consolation" prize. Some consolation, huh?!
Gap the mind inside outside
Also of key importance to the value of this locale is its close proximity to Seoul, the nation’s capital and largest city, Hong Kong, Beijing, Japan, and Australia. We’ll be trying to fit in as many interesting trips as possible.
So here it is, from Edinburgh, Scotland, with a funny vibe and an even more funnier title:
I'd love to hear your honest thoughts on Anja's Met Ball look.
Ain't these tears in my eyes tellin' you
The canyons of New York are as useful for game designers as they are for film directors. If the decision is arbitrary, then New York represents a kind of go-to alpha city: the logical choice if you need a city at all. For film directors it's a grand and familiar backdrop, and the same bold geometry is relatively straightforward for game technologies to render. The grid-like topology, an added bonus, is easy for gamers to understand and navigate, too.
This, on the face of it, though, does not refer to IEDs – more likely to RPGs. But, whether or not QinetiQ then reported on the failings of the Snatch, the most serious shortcomings, in respect of dealing with the explosively formed projectile (EFP), could not have been known. That weapon was not deployed in a fatal attack until 1 May 2005, when Guardsmen Anthony Wakefield and Gary Alderson were killed.
My mind is wandering off on to not good things. Thinking too much about my future and what will become of me.
This is why my first date attire is determined purely by the weather.
RSS Feed :
This March I was extra lucky and gifted with a new Nespresso maker from my very thoughtful parents. This is the model they got me:
In this extraordinary tale of magic and intrigue, romance and danger, everything you thought you knew about faeries will be changed forever. Okay, I'm not going to lie to you. When I first heard about this series my reaction was "eh, who cares?", it did look too interesting to me. But when I received an ARC of Destined, the 4th book in this series from Harper Teen, I figured I should start it so I could review Destined. And Wings was pretty good!
Sinbad battles a fiendish magician and his many monsters.
“Color” measures the extent of discoloring in a white diamond. There are twenty-three different grades of white, with “D” (colorless) being the most valuable and “Z” (light yellow) the least desirable. I’ve always been a bit slow when it comes to languages. I only mastered my ABCs in grade three. Perhaps that’s why my eyes could detect no difference between D, E, F and G.
So I decided to use it for the MK Block Party Entry
Any large baking pan with a lip on it is perfect for cooking bacon. I use a large bar pan but a jelly roll pan would work fine. If you are cooking less than a pound of bacon you might even use a 9X13 pan.
in the music
DOUBLE-LINKED SINGLE COINCIDENCE TYPE:
It’s a budget hotel so do not expect anything fabulous, however their WiFi is strong, their room is clean and the location of the hotel is near some local businesses like Jollibee, Starbucks, Savemore, Bag of Beans etc.
Game 3: Texas 5 Toronto 11
PCU (Power Control Unit)
Like the chill of autumn appearing in my new pill.
Question: Do you know why schools have bells that ring and break up the day?
A "match-up" is a listing of a great sale item along with where to find a matching coupon (either with a link to a printable coupon or it will tell you the date that the coupon was in the Sunday paper...this is why you don't clip your coupons each Sunday.)
As I was working on my to do list today before the movers come I stopped in my tracks and decided I wanted to remember this house. I grabbed my camera and took pictures of all the rooms and yes I cried as I took photos of the kids rooms are remembered them as babies laying it their cribs. I cried in my room looking at my bed and thinking about all those sleepless nights nursing a baby and all the nights I tried to sleep sitting up because pregnancy heartburn is so awful. I sobbed some more in my kitchen thinking about the meals I cooked with G in the moby wrap or the dinner we ate with L in the bumbo seat at the table with us. I cried, I let it all out and I cried… not because I love this house so much, but because this is my children’s first home. There won’t be another home like this one. I cried because they are growing up and I feel like and I am missing it somehow. And I cried because that’s me, I cry.
Pride?
Colours Collection
Romantics Talking in your sleep US
I hope she reads this!
Why do I always find something to worry about?
08. Beggar's farm
Snack: Jell-o Temptation Key Lime Pies (100 calories)
It is the spectator, and not life, that art really mirrors.
On the second day of his visit to Pakistan, the Indian Commerce Minister addressed a luncheon meeting hosted by the Karachi Chamber of Commerce and Industry. Pakistan, he said, was bound to grant the MFN status to India under the WTO regime, regardless of the difficulties it might face. He was hopeful that Pakistan would be ready with the negative list soon.
“I’ve just been on the phone and explained that no-one has actually been to my home… I don’t have a docket”
She drinks water from a blue bottle
Following up with my post earlier this week on “Being Content”, if you haven’t read it, you can click on the link here. God has been doing a miraculous work in me this week. I have gone from being overwhelmed and discontent to now being appreciative. I decided to post my resume on dice this week and after that I got a flood of emails and calls. In the process of talking to some of the potential places, I began to see things in a new light where I currently work.
As her music career began to falter, Mumba turned to acting. She appeared in a number of Irish indie films, as well as 2002's big-budget sci-fi flick "The Time Machine."
Their nets are set for capture.
Teri
All I ask in return is to put my button on your blog, even if it's on another page or waaaaaaaay down at the bottom :) Cause hey, sharing is caring, right? :D
On an allegation which surfaced on pro-Umno blogs that Ooi himself leaked the story, Ooi replied: “I wouldn’t trust the blogs. I have been a world class blogger, compared to this.”:
4. see Radiohead in Taiwan this July, so I better win soon.
yesteryears, among which are some quaint and rustic
“From the days of Spartacus, Weishaupt, Karl Marx, Trotski, Belacoon, Rosa Luxenberg and Ema Goldman, this world conspiracy has been steadily growing. This conspiracy played a definite recognizable role in the French Revolution. It has been the mainspring of every subversive movement during the 19th century. And now at last, this band of extraordinary personalities from the under- world of the great cities of Europe and America have gripped the Russian people by the hair of their head and have become the undisputed masters of that enormous empire.” – Winston Churchill to the London press in 1922.
Yesterday they also had a political correspondent called Candy Crowley who complained that she was immediately in front of the Presidential limousine on a flat-bed truck, looking like the Wreck of the Hesperus (an old expression my mother used to use). Perhaps when she agreed to this she misheard the producer's question: 'Are you up for a truck?'
“I don’t want to get into details about this, but I want to avoid being hit by darts of Black Lotus poison. So when we get to Hobbington, you guys can wrap me up in a blanket and carry me as if I’m dead. That way we can get past the guards.” said Hermel looking toward the ceiling of the cave as he formulated his plan.
“Bob,” Henrietta said, “you are not a chicken. You are a rooster. You need to stop clucking and learn how to crow so you can wake up the girls every morning. That’s what roosters do.”
“How ya doin’ big guy?” she inquired merrily. “I just loved your act with the clowns!”
This skirt was one of last year's most-worn items. I didn't tally its wearings, but it seems to have been worn a lot in my memory. And no surprise really, as it's black and white and doesn't need ironing, or even to be on a hanger. It does, however, have some not-amazing memories to go with it. Today I even considered putting it in my giveaway pile. We'll see.
I loved these SOOOOOOOO much (I have one on each side of my porch), I really didn't want to take them down when we started pulling out the Christmas lights... but don't want to annoy the neighbors, so back in the fall decorating box they go.
I got on a kick with my Mesh Pumpkin Wreath, and then my second Mesh Pumpkin Wreath (I should have seen a problem forming.) I was blind to it though and let my mind run away with all of the things I wanted to do with mesh. Every holiday would have mesh draped upon it in some form or fashion!
After hunting unsuccessfully through stock boxes for a working Weston it suddenly occurred to me that the solution might be in my pocket.
It was about then I began to wonder if some aspects of my humor weren't a tad juvenile. I mean, laughing at the same thing a twenty-month-old found amusing? The same thing that makes babies all over the world laugh?
When I signed up, I knew it was going to be on a larger temari than I'd worked before (you usually start off your career on balls that have a 3"--about 7.5cm--diameter styrofoam ball at their core). Like this:
The greater struggle with telling the truth is not the situation that requires discretion – it is the life-struggle that prefers to lie. Our enmeshment in the ersatz existence of lying reveals our estrangement from God. It is even the case that within the lie that we sometimes live, we serve a God who is a delusion, a creation of our own distortions. The discipline of telling the truth is thus at the same time the discipline of knowing the true God.
A=Apple, B=Bird, C=Cat, etc.
I finished the first phase of revising Dragon a week or so ago, but now I have the second phase ahead of me. This is the part that requires creative energy on my part, fleshing out sections, rewording sentences, building in details, and so forth. I’m ready to get started, but the problem is time.
It's a time when people think about others more than themselves.
So, with 100 days left and 140 under my belt, I have made it over the "hump", I get to write this post about being at 100 days left to go, and I got to take my glucose test. All things I didn't get to do with Bailey.
(800) 386-5438 (Chicago)
Remember, even if you are not studying with a teacher, you can still teach your self with listening and practicing. Its like educational entertainment, having fun while still learning. One of the biggest benefits to music education is that it is possible to never stop learning and never truly master your craft. As a music consultant, one of my favorite production tips, playing tips and just overall listening tips is to tell artists to go find out where their favorite musicians, producers and composers were inspired from. If you like John Bonham as a drummer, look up his interviews where he talks about the guys and music that blew him away.
McCarty added: "We are committed to responding to our customers' needs. If interest continues in non epoxy-based coatings, we will offer cans with those coatings when the coatings become commercially available."
I see a picture of Mayor Tomas wearing his Suya Ra ang Probinsya shirt. He looked great on it. Yes, he was. But will the City’s staff look great with it? They might look great but I doubt if they would feel great.
So, why are females so centrally focused on male partnership or male protection in movies?
"They've allied with the Devil Himself!"
And that's what we did. 2x2 miles to be exact. With about a quarter mile recovery in the middle. Well, first I rode my bike to the track (a little over 3 miles) and we did our warm-ups and moving drills in the parking lot. Then we did a 1 "lap" warm-up before moving into the main workout.
I laid the rolling pin just where her neck meets her shoulder and started gently rolling up and down.
Nomination 3: Magic Rock
Transfer dough into covered and oiled bowl. Let rise for 1-1 1/2 hours until doubled.
We have just ordered the boys new beds. They still sleep in the bunk beds we bought for them when Carys was born. Yes at almost 18 and 20 they are still in bunk beds. I'm hoping they can cope with the change.
When one of the judges questioned whether they had authority to weigh in on the issue at this stage, Mallin’s reply drew laughs: “The
The LEPs that might be made by Council, without Ministerial approval, are as follows:
5. Wanna Run (4:22)
This is how I’m feeling right now. Like a doll who’s had its heart taken out.
- Minimise your social life so you can go home and feed him/her at certain set hours?
SLAM MY HANDS DOWN ON THE DESK AND FORCE MYSELF TO WALK AWAY. THIS IS THE ONLY WAY TO DO IT. QUICKLY AND FORCEFULLY. LIKE A BANDAID. EAT. DRINK. NOT NECESSARILY IN THAT ORDER. WATCH BUFFY THE VAMPIRE SLAYER AND WONDER: WHY DOES EVERYONE DUMP ON SPIKE AND WHICH BIAS TAPE SHOULD I USE ON THOSE DRESSES. NOT NECESSARILY IN THAT ORDER.
It was clear to me from this observation that no matter how implicitly I trusted Kev's abilities to head a football, I would require his services as an explorer no more than I would need Fielder's as a navigator. I suggested dropping Fielder off in the Durley countryside to make his own way home, much like Richard Branson's parents did to their eight year old son; but not wanting manslaughter on my conscience, I resisted.
Pop up the giraffe and hippos backside on dimensionals for 3-D effect.
Mary W and Carol
(the movie Gamer, The Proposal) 2 movies within a few days that have “I’ve Got You Under My Skin” in the soundtrack.
This is the third installment of "The Invisible Finite" by Robert A. Wait, a Gernsback Era science fiction story published for the first and only time in the May 1929 issue of Amazing Stories.
As many of you know, I've been on modified bed rest for the last two weeks. It basically means I have to lie on the couch for hours and only get up to use the bathroom or fix myself or the kids a quick sandwich. I've watched every show on daytime tv, which, let me just say: there is literally nothing good on except House Hunters and Paula Deen! During the other 23 hours of the day, I've been reading... one book after the next. I've found myself reading auto biographies like The Glass Castle, Angela's Ashes, and The Hiding Place. While some people might find this kind of reading depressing, I find it cathartic. It's nice to be reminded there are other people out there who have seen worse... much worse.
“Do you have a word processing program on your computer?”
Falling in love so deeply at a young age made it difficult to be as reckless as our friends. We watched them coast in and out of short, fun, but meaningless relationships and it just seemed so different to what we had.
How about you? How do you deal with situations where you feel a victim? How do you deal with situations where you feel it is personal?
“I am often confused when you talk about your gardens. How many gardens do you have? Where are they? Can you do a blog post about your gardens and how they came to be?”
Because, as always, it’s the story that’s the thing. That’s a truism, of course, but the Christmas story is an unusual one because in one sense it’s the very first dramatisation of history for education and entertainment.
Thanks again, and keep checking in to more stories on your favorite Division 1 coaches.
Another good book I picked up at our CF Clinic's CF day is called, What's up with Justin? Medikids Explain Nutrition in Kids with Cystic Fibrosis. It is put out by the pharmaceutical company Abbott. I was able to grab a copy from our local Abbott representative.
Most people come back from internships at big companies and talk about how they didn’t do much more than make a bunch of photocopies and run errands. I am almost at the end of my internship, and I have learned so much. I have learned all about the process of book publishing and what it entails. With such a small office of only three full-time workers, TIPS offers an environment that is conducive to learning, which is what an internship is all about.
Oh, and to go along with the "dead animal" title, Aaron told me today that there was something in his shoe this morning when he put it on for work. He stepped in it and it felt full and squishy. So he took it off.
But it’s not like all conferences are created equal, or ever will be. The Big Ten, the Southeastern Conference, the Big 12, the Pac-10, the ACC and the Big East already enjoy recruiting advantages over other conferences. Their stadiums, arenas and practice facilities are larger and more luxurious. Their geographic footprints are wider. Their TV contracts are more lucrative. Their coaches’ salaries are higher. Their tradition, Q ratings and alumni bases are more pronounced.
Margin is simply a ratio and the calculation is:
Jean-Claude Van Damme is having a really, really bad day. He’s broke, Steven Segal just beat him out for a role, and it looks as if he’s about to lose custody of his daughter. What’s a guy to do? Rob a post office?
Yes, to a certain extent. Judaism isn’t just a religion, it’s a people. So in that sense I find myself relating to all Jews. Coming from a cultural perspective, as people, yes. Coming from a religious standpoint, I don’t really identify or connect with reformed Judaism or reconstructionist as much, or conservative Judaism. I believe that the Torah’s the real deal; it’s the real thing. Within Orthodox Judaism there’s different branches, so I do find myself sort gravitating towards Hasidic and Kabbalistic thought, employing from those places mainly.
Dough in and raised to 122F for 15, raised to 156F for 60, raised to 165F for 15. Recirculate until cleared and fly sparged to pre boil volume.
109.7 g
The security is very high with HP security officers coming by to check on the property multiple times each day, as well as surveillance cameras located all around the grounds. If you try to sneak into the backyard you won't get far.
Not because he’s angry (that’s covered), but simply because he gets really excited and starts treating everything and everyone like a set of drums. When we stop him (which we always do) and seriously tell him “don’t hit”, he just giggles. It doesn’t matter how loud and angry PH gets, or how quickly I take him off of the breast. He thinks our reactions, whatever they might be, are hilarious, and hits again to elicit the same reaction.
I have another chiro appointment tomorrow. My back does feel better after the first appointment, I should be back to rights after the one tomorrow. Yoga starts again on the 2nd, none too soon.
So, if you live in the Phoenix area and know of someone who could be made feel special in this way, let me know.
what's a tooth go for these days??? I'm sure you've spent tons of money on teeth with 6 kids. lol
I learned that Thoroughbred horses are not the most friendly to me and my family.
Lipstick - MAC 'Morange'
We have witnessed something very disturbing this week. The Republican establishment which fought Ronald Reagan in the 1970s and which continues to fight the grassroots Tea Party movement today has adopted the tactics of the left in using the media and the politics of personal destruction to attack an opponent.
So we are heading though the Lincolnshire countryside to Leicester. I know the main road is quicker, but I just love to see all the little villages along the way. I have seen some lovely little villages on our travels so far. I could quite happily settle here i think! Hoping to see Stilton soon, (yum yum, stilton is my fave cheese!!)
This year, I decided to give Passover my best effort. This meant no secret trips to the pantry to eat bowls of Rice-Krispies (“that’s not technically leavened bread…right?”) and not “accidentally” forgetting that tortillas are against the rules. I am committed to finding creative ways to embrace the holiday, in all its bread-less glory.
Lost in your Arms is a romantic adventure that will leave you smiling.
The hidden last cut on the CD—if it’s not called Soma Coma, it should be. So what’s it called?
get ready for another reality, and of course…loose a few pounds…
Eating in Paris is the main event. Sure, you can come here to climb the Eiffel Tower or gawk at the Mona Lisa, but food – and the 24-hour-a-day appreciation of it – is what a visit to France should really be all about.
U.S. Department of Energy. (1994). Drawing back the curtain of secrecy, restricted data declassification policy, 1946 to the present. (Report No. RDD-1). DOE, Office of Declassification, Washington D.C.
Every day you spend without a smile, is a lost day. ~Author Unknown
And I was devastated.
He said that the only option citizens had was to challenge the validity of the electoral roll in court through capable legal eagles like Bersih co-chairperson Ambiga Sreenevasan and Subang MP Sivarasa Rasiah.
didn’t run at all. Stopped in summers youth,
As luck would have it, I was recruited by a junior hockey team (basically a U21 elite league that college coaches recruit from) in the girls’ home state. I went to the tryout in May 2006, and met up with four of the five girls that weekend, including FigureSkater. By the time I met up with the girls, I had already been offered a contract, that I planned on signing, and assumed I would be spending a lot of time in that area the next year.
With that said, we now need 50 followers to complete Round 2! Tell your digi stamp friends about the giveaway and their chance to win a free digi...otherwise we could be waiting a while until the next draw! :) Good luck everyone! ♥
5 ll
And I am old
So in our text, Paul uses the word “exhort.” “I exhort you to be of good cheer.” This means to urge. He was emphatic. Just as God takes no delight in our sadness, neither do God’s people. Paul had a great burden for his shipmates. He was urging them to believe the good news.
I'm still just trying to process everything because so much has happened.
Watching the news channel in Warsaw, I realised suddenly that there is an unconscionable amount of fascinating history, geography, economics - life! - about which I knew absolutely nothing, just because of where I was born.
I say all this to convince myself, of course. I have difficulty being a ‘proper’ wife and a ‘proper’ mother too - and I certainly haven’t got a ‘proper’ job! That’s nine to five, isn’t it?!
Annie Rossi
OK, so I run to the store and before Lexi and I get in line to check out, Joe called me to ask me something about the kids. A few seconds later, Savannah texted me.
We all make mistakes in early drafts--and I'm a firm believer in letting the creative juices flow without self-editing as I go. (I'll let you know how that works out if I ever actually manage to accomplish it.) But since I wanted to try this out, I took the opening 10,000 words of the first draft of The Dream Weaver, the YA Paranormal I am currently working on, and ran a quick analysis.
After a stop in the middle of nowhere to refuel (both the helicopter and ourselves with water - it was 100degrees outside!) we headed back to base. It was surreal seeing the landscape go from miles and miles of nothing to a sudden burst of weird and wonderful hotels on the horizon. Flying over the strip was incredible, giving us the chance to see all of the sights of Vegas from the air. We flew close to the Stratosphere hotel which we would be eating at later that evening.
Advice: Monitor your thoughts. All thoughts are prayers. Be careful what you ask for. 45. Left -brain fogginess. Your psychic abilities, your intuitive knowing, your feeling and compassion, your ability to experience your body, your visioning, your expressiveness all emanate from the right brain. In order for this side of the brain to develop more fully, the left brain must shut down a little bit. Normally the left-hemisphere’s capacity for order, organization,structure, linear sequencing, analysis, evaluation, precision, focus, problem-solving, and mathematics dominate our often less-valued right brain.
An absolutely stunning production, devoid of high profile names, this totally inoffensive movie is one of the most delightful films I have seen specifically made for children for years. This is a must see for fairy believers of all ages.
17 These things I have spoken unto you that ye may love one another.
Have a great Valentine's Day tomorrow!
Actually I can't really remember what happened during these past few months, but I bet it was overwhelming. But what I do remember is that I've stopped posting with my last post....the one before this one. The one called "Spaced Out", which (come to think of it) was very well received and absolutely everybody liked it. Thus, unfortunately for you, my readers, I'll abandon this path of education because it was truly hard to follow and quite boring; however, in this new post, we'll talk about statistics! Because we all know how fun they are!
Meanwhile you want to bring a pot of water to a boil, and once boiling, add salt and the pasta, cooking until al dente. This is important, you want to reserve about a cup of the pasta cooking water before draining the pasta. When you add the pasta to the skillet with the squash you will also add some of the pasta cooking water. Toss in some freshly grated pecorino or parmesan. As you stir it all together, the pasta cooking water will work its magic, melding everything together into a fabulous, light, and spicy sauce. Serve immediately, passing extra pecorino or parmesan at the table.
My code was originally :-
The little, stooped figure straightened up, made a dismissive gesture, and said something in Dutch, which was translated to me as, "He who has butter on his head, should stay out of the sun."
I had problems with AOL in the UK… but come on! That was nothing compared to NET!
(a couple of clicks)
I hope I didn’t miss anything, tell too much, tell anything wrong or confuse you all. Rosario? Danny? What are your sides of the story? Ha!
Dear Secretary-General,
just before the storm.
8) Return to the lady in Agotrop with the leaf. The game says she takes the leaf, but she actually doesn't. She tells you the mercenaries left the inn but didn't take the safe with them, and there's a hole in their room you probably could sneak into to take back the safe.
Example, think library late fees. Nobody takes these seriously because, well, worst case scenario, you pay 15 cents. By the way, the one of the biggest jerk move is when someone pays their library late fee with a $20 bill. The librarian has to open up the empty cash register, sigh, and confess they can’t make change therefore cancelling the 10 cent fee.
Jezebel.com’s Lauri Apple has provided an interesting, and, inevitably, sad article about the state of sexual harassment defenses in today’s USA. Perhaps it is not surprising that old defenses and new are still both outlandish and craptastic. Worse still is that some men still behave badly and feel no remorse about it. Behavior doesn’t change for some… unfortunately.
The letter begins “My Dear Girl,” which might reflect the eleven-year age difference between the silversmith and his second wife. Revere addressed the challenge of leaving the besieged town:
just am so proud of her…Her name is Shai’ana and she is 16 1/2…she organizes and rallies with the best of causes..this one she helped organize and left school early yesterday to attend this march in Center City Philadelphia yesterday..she organizes clothing drives and volunteer organizations for her and her friends to walk dogs at the SPCA…shes always doing community service and I couldnt be any prouder….
NOTE: The picture above is for KMST. In KMS, they changed the golden leaf to be 5 Maple Leaves and added a rainbow leaf that gives 10 Maple Leaves.
Rouge de Garance PP
Deanie’s salads. I was so hungry that I wolfed mine down pretty quickly, but I should have savored it, because I think this is the most amount of roughage we would see in New Orleans in the entire week.
Our Challenge this fortnight is
Secondly, I can't remember if I've established this or not, but I like dogs infinitely more than people. I delight in the misery of others, but get sad when dogs are upset. The borderline abusive shitheads who bring their dogs to a huge crowd like this one need to be put to sleep. And I'm willing to do this. That poor dog who was shaking in fear at the crowds? I wanted to kick the teeth of its owner down his throat and feed his fucking leg to his dog.
So - over to Geri. There's a competition here too!
"The Golden Dagger"
Swallows me whole
Voucher Amount (0.00)
Even the biggest house didn't seem to have space for four children, so I did what any good writer would do – poked around until I found the guy in charge of the chickens, and asked him. My book had mentioned priests denouncing the immorality of brothers and sisters sharing a bed – but, as my new incredibly knowledgeable best friend pointed out, sometimes families didn't have much choice.
The foam is pretty dense when it comes out of the pump dispenser, and one pump is enough for a full face wash. There’s a fresh citrus scent which probably comes from the citrus orange oil and mandarin orange oil.
Ringo Starr
You decide what your standards are. Don’t be so strict that you knock yourself out of the game before you even get started.
Nor the way Dylan’s eyes light up when he runs past twenty similar leaves on the ground to choose one specific leaf to show me in delight.
Well now the funk is over and I am feeling very overwhelmed. I have SO MUCH I want to say and I am kind of not sure where to begin. This is such a busy and fun time of year for us. Spring brings baseball and good weather and reasons to spend it outdoors and both the kids birthdays and looking ahead to summer and seeing what it is going to have in store for us. So much going on and coming up in the next few months.
If you are attending the event:
Coaches are always yelling at players to play it safe, instead of taking risks in the penalty area. Something as simple as selecting quality soccer drills at a young age can go a long way toward improving our players in the future. — Ultimate soccer coaching.com
1) a woman who has a child and becomes a different person than she was before (often a former feminist); her conversations all revolve around toilet training, feeding schedules, and the occasional housework; so-called because there’s a certain glazed look in the eyes and she appears to have been brainwashed
Article 6 If a lawfully established collective copyright management organization files an action in its own name and with a written authorization from the copyrighter, with a competent people's court, such action shall be duly accepted.
So for years I have called Prince Charming "Cheap." But I recently read an article called "Being Frugal vs. Being Cheap" at Live Renewed and started to wonder if maybe he's just frugal.
For some people, love does not come naturally. We easily judge and get irritated when these people are around — a neighbor who is a drug addict, a sibling who is an irresponsible bum, a rebellious friend, an annoying classmate, a strict teacher, a corrupt politician. We need prayer to place us in the field of God’s love and be filled with compassion. Nothing spurs compassion in us through prayer.
What’s Bad About It
“I don’t like your jokes.”
This is a grant of rights and a non-competition clause all in one, and authors need to think carefully before agreeing to it. Contrary to what many authors seem to believe, the regular KDP program does encumber rights, and gives Amazon considerable control over intellectual property (see this comment from me on an earlier blog post for an analysis)--but it does so non-exclusively and imposes no burden on other works. KDP Select goes much farther: it makes Amazon, in effect, your publisher while your book is included in the program, and potentially has an impact on other work you are or are planning to publish. (See this post from Passive Voice for a detailed analysis of the dangers of non-competition clauses.)
Do you lock your doors while you're at home? During the day? During the night?
After I found out I passed, I immediately came back home. Brian and I then headed out straight to his parent’s house to celebrate my birthday.
My wife is the pragmatic one in our family when it comes to money matters. It took awhile, and I still have to go to regular meetings and be faithful to the 12-step program, but she finally made me take a hard look at my Xmas addiction. The burden of debt the holidays put us under when I was in charge of the present buying was crippling. Now we’ve adopted a budget for our holiday spending which includes swearing off credit cards and the evils of other same as cash incentives. We decide on a number we think we can afford and work backwards from there.
I had my Lilly entertaining book propped open with the derby section for fun!
My mom is so happy to be with her sister. My aunt needed my mom and my mom has needed her. In the last yr. and a half my aunt has lost her husband, daughter, mother and sister. It's been a taxing yr. for her. My mother lost her mother, sister, mother in law, niece and brother in law.
can we ever learn to just savor a moment? can i just take in a short experience and have it be just as satisfying…maybe even more…as buying it?
Some Multiculturalists have claimed that “Santa Claus was a Turk.” The Christian Saint Nicholas, who partly inspired the tales about Santa Claus, lived in Anatolia. This area is now known as Turkey, but there were no Turks there in the fourth century. They originated in Central Asia. In the eleventh century, Anatolia was populated by Greek-speaking Christians. They have since then become victims of a brutal ethnic cleansing, a process still going on in Cyprus today.
I was just talking to Will from The Gentlemen's Guide to Midnite Cinema about Intrepidos Punks, the trashy mexploitation I reviewed last October. In particular we were talking about how the female Dee Snider in the film was hot in some weird way.
When neighbours knew each other best…
Or sell out to a scandal sheet.
The photo says everything, though.
5. Brown Cow yogurt, 6 oz. cups, .59/ea. at Sun Harvest (through 11/17/10)
As I type, our cat, Tessie, has manage to curl up in my lap and I'm reaching over her to type as I lay here half-reclined on the couch. She's happily purring and I'm trying not to disturb her.
June- August
(For the record, the weather isn't one of them, unless we're having one of those great, glorious winters where the daytime temperatures are kind enough to hover around 60 degrees. Today's high? 44. Current temperature? 33. With a wind-chill of 25. Not my kind of weather, at all.)
First of all, a newco implies the end of the oldco. More realistically, it involves the assets of Rangers being sold to a newco, and then, supposedly, the proceeds of the sale of the assets being used to fund the CVA for unsecured creditors so that, once everyone is happy and the debt extinguished, the newco and oldco merge and the history is saved!
Thank you for your comments. I could not choose just one, so here we have to popcorn box (small size) and 32 inch circles, the circles were designed to fit WL-5375 from World Label. I chose to leave the lines on the circles, but in a very light color that will blend, for those will choose to cut the circles out with scissors :)
The Foundry - 5 to 9pm - Summer Beer Fest in Westport: details coming soon
But there weren’t too many famous shields in fantasy, which is understandable. Swords are offensive weapons; shields are defensive. You can barely read classic or heroic fantasy without tripping over a sword that’s special in some way; not so for shields. When I started thinking of shields, though, numerous ideas came to mind.
On the positive side, I find the frame to be well-made and well thought-out. The joints are clean and do not call attention to themselves, the braze-ons precise, the fork crown beautifully executed. I really like the paint colour and the general frame aesthetics. I like that there is no toe overlap (though it's close and could depend on your shoe size and pedals). And the low trail design with clearance for 650B x42mm Grand Bois Hetres is what drew me to the frame in the first place.
The Prince, according to experts acted surprisingly like he had been married for 20 odd years as he drifted off in to a trance during an interview. After being nudged by Kate Prince William came out of his day dream muttering about his big chopper and Kate’s ring.
Wednesday 16 May 2012, 5.15pm St. Chad’s College
Cut eggplant in 3/4-inch thick slices. Lightly sprinkle both sides with sea salt and place slices in a colander to drain excess moisture. Allow to set for 30 minutes. Wipe off salt with paper towel.
Many couples eloped without parental consent and were married “over the anvil” at the popular blacksmith’s shop in Gretna Green. After 1856, Scottish law changed to require 21 days’ residence for marriage, yet Gretna Green remained a center for romantic and irregular weddings until 1940. In 1977, the residency requirement was replaced by a two week notice of intention.
Kate will be giving away some Fireworks to a random commenter ON TODAY’S DT POSTS so the more you hop and comment, the more chances you have to win! Winner will be announced on Friday so you have until Thursday 9PM EST to leave those comments!
On the one hand, there are the Calvinists who so emphasize the divine causality as to diminish free will. Indeed, their doctrine of double-predestination makes man to be nothing more than a donkey, ridden either by Satan into hell or by God into heaven.
However - this is the very poshest Bird on Wheels I've made to date, it's another 5" x 7" canvas as I seem to be going through a phase of making these canvases lately.
So did the first 'Marlboro Man.'
Perhaps it's capricious of me, but the reality is the onus isn't on me as a consumer to "support" a business. I do what I can, but I'm not going to shop in a store that gives me the same or even worse service than Amazon or a big chain. I think the smartest approach indies can take is to focus on what they can do that Amazon can't: giving welcoming, personalized service in their stores. Appealing to the consumer's sense of fairness and right/wrong will get indies about as far as it has the green movement. Far too often I see indies take their customers for granted. These days, it's just too easy for people stay home and order online. Indies shouldn't make it easier by being jerks to their customers.
Let’s say you finished writing… something. Anything. You did a little research and found your dream publisher(s) – no matter if it’s a publishing house, a magazine, an anthology, your local newspaper. Now, it’s time to submit your work to their attention. It’s not enough that you are already anxious about pressing that “send” button. No, you want to make sure you’re doing it right. So, you search something like “how to write a cover letter to a publisher” or “how to write a cover letter for writing submissions” or anything similar.
As beauty to biased eyes.
In all the euphoria about Rehman, the world forgot the lyrist and that too a great genius of music industry. Gulzar Saheb got very little coverage for his awesome work.
Of course, there are exceptions, and those are: toiletries, underwear, socks, shoes, household goods (i.e. lightbulbs, tape, etc.), school supplies, car goods (tires, brakes, etc.), computer parts, and business items (i.e. tools, metal, stones, shipping items). Oh! And, since I will be a Matron of Honor for my best friend's wedding, the dress and shoes for that are true exceptions. My body type just does not do well with vintage dresses, and I will probably need specific shoes for this adventure :)
What if, even to this day, the Christian response to Islamic terrorism was grace and forgiveness instead of hatred and violence?
Just as this happen, Mary gets a call from her dad. The conversation is long enough for the FBI to track the call, but the call doesn’t actually reveal anything except what we already knew. James is the one who killed Sully and he did it to protect Mary and the family. He won’t turn himself in and ends the call by trying to help Mary saying she had nothing to do with what he’s doing, but O’Connor won’t take that. While he’s on the phone, we see James removing a box from a hiding spot. Supposedly the real jewels. But where were they?
I sewed a pink button to the centre of the tissue flower and then added some stickles and lastly a little pearl in the centre of that. I put the flower aside and then stamped a leaf silhouette from one of Kim Hughes collections from Cornish Heritage Farms. Hey, speaking of Cornish Heritage Farms ... did you know that the website is having a Re-Grand Opening on November 19th? If you remember or even if you don't remember the old store and you're interested in seeing what's coming up click here. Right, so as I was saying ... I stamped the leaves direct to the card front and then used a white pen to add some little specks on the leaves. I made the frame that the sentiment from CDS - Words of Sympathy is in using a combination of nestabilities, Labels Eighteen and Classic Ovals. Lastly I used the white pen again and traced around the border of the frame.
Enough of my rambling, hehe! For this page I wanted some cute birthday accents, so I used the Chomas Creations adjustable pen holder for the Silhouette Cameo with a stylus (which I now carry in the Chomas Creations store just for you all!) and the Chomas Creations embossing mat to emboss the birthday presents on a metal sheet. Here is a pic of the stylus in the adjustable pen holder. As you can see I used the popcycle stick to adjust the height. I set my pressure to 33 and my speed to 6. Metal sheets are easy to cut with regular scissors after you have embossed! And I sanded the raised image on these.
2010.07.28 Iraq Baghdad 6 15 Six people waiting in line at a bank lose their place in life, courtesy of Muslim bombers.
Paul was giving these Jews in Jerusalem one more chance, not as a nation, for they were set aside. He was speaking to the people as individuals. God was now saving souls by grace through faith. If they would believe on the Lord Jesus Christ they would be saved. That is what he told the jailer in Philippi in Acts 16:31. It certainly worked for him and his family just as it did for me.
Green chillies- 2 cut and de-seeded
Like boiling lava,
A vote for Ken is a vote for getting your voices heard and working towards ending discrimination.
Hope we have more success stories than not today....but if we do maybe we can come up with a way to change that for us...or at least change our expectations of others' approach.
Add the lemon slices and broccoli to the pot, recover and cook for 5 more minutes.
but Shine.
And I wasn't really focused to what she asked,
I stopped in Vega just long enough to photograph a wooden chicken in front of a Mexican restaurant. But in Adrian, I stayed long enough to have lunch at the Midpoint Cafe.
2) Worked from 195 to 255 (couldn’t lock out the push jerk repeatedly. effin wrist)
This year, my company, Piedmont Office Realty Trust, took a step in a similar direction, but on a more personal scale: We hosted a summer internship program that gave five young people from Chicago International Charter School a behind-the-scenes perspective on what it takes to manage an office building and work in a professional business environment; and hopefully, we offered them a better chance to reach their full potential as adults.
3 c. flour (quickly sifted)
I also see a nation coming to its knees as its people are forced to worship other gods, above our Almighty Lord. I see a country high-jacked by FIFA and all the pretty sports stadiums and newly tarred roads, fancy hotels, --- all built to amaze and please the soccer fans, who will come here to worship their gods for a short while, -- and then leave. I honestly cannot see what benefit this will bring to our country and its people, not in the short-term or the long-term.
___ Partnership X-NC Corporation ___ Other __________________________
The nonprofit behind this digital push, Bush’s Foundation for Excellence in Education, is funded by online learning companies: K12 Inc., Pearson (which recently bought Connections Education), Apex Learning (a for-profit online education company launched by Microsoft co-founder Paul Allen), Microsoft and McGraw-Hill Education among others. The advisory board for Bush’s ten digital elements agenda reads like a Who’s Who of education-technology executives, reformers, bureaucrats and lobbyists, including Michael Stanton, senior vice president for corporate affairs at Blackboard; Karen Cator, director of technology for the Education Department; Jaime Casap, a Google executive in charge of business development for the company’s K-12 division; Shafeen Charania, who until recently served as marketing director of Microsoft’s education products department; and Bob Moore, a Dell executive in charge of “facilitating growth” of the computer company’s K-12 education practice.
How To Buy A Portable Hot Tub or Home Spa
"Don't go chasing shadows, Arthur..."
Cerniglia, who owned the eatery Campana, was in a 2007 episode of Ramsay’s reality TV show “Kitchen Nightmares.” In that installment, Ramsay blasted Cerniglia and told him his restaurant was “about to float down the Hudson,” which the Post said was an eerily prescient comment in light of how the Jersey chef ended his life.
Happy days,
Traditional medicines
Neville Bartos: The leg is okay, all right?
While the trolley will take you to a cluster of cemeteries located near City Park, they start to feel the same. If you’re not a history or cemetery buff, skip the trolley cemetery route and visit St. Louis Cemetery #1, located just blocks from the French Quarter near the Iberville housing project (which means probably best to avoid at night). St. Louis Cemetery #1 is the oldest Catholic cemetery in New Orleans. Located at 3421 Esplanade Avenue, it opened in 1789. Legend has written that Marie Laveau, the “Voodoo Queen,” is buried in the Glapion family crypt, although there is no proof of the fact. Yet, the grave is marked with souvenirs and triple X’s visitors have marked after leaving coins for good luck. The most interesting statistic to me is that over 100,000 people have been laid to rest in #1, and it’s just one city block today.
15. - interview in swedish -
Pseudo-Chrys.: As much as to say, How do ye not understand in what building that stone is to be set, not in yours, seeing it is rejected, but in another; but if the building is to be other, your building will be rejected.
Est. ABV: 5.10 %
17. My mother taught me about RECEIVING.
Tomovich and others said the police dragged his sleeping housemate Justin Bieber, Pratt ‘06, off of his bed, causing him to fall on the floor, before dragging him down the stairs.
I may not be dreamy about it and walk around thinking someone’s going to break into song and tell me they love me, but I do like to believe that there is someone out there who is perfect for me.
“That’s why they call me ‘the Wizard.’” I responded.
Memories of The One
that, promise you that
Here’s a seasonal gift that would be wearable all year – a heart pendant by Lyn Gutteridge (Twirlybeads). She has made a matching charm bead too:
So, onto our new challenge!!!
Citizen Union issued a "No Preference" in seven state legislative races, deciding not to support either the incumbent or the challenger, mostly because the challengers were not credible or strong enough in their effort to oust incumbents whose reelection we could not support.
It's full-on Spring here and the weather has been mostly fantastic. I missed my chance to take photos of bare branches against the winter-grey sky because now everything is either blooming like crazy or leafing out in a green so bright it hurts your eyes. Or both.
Community Benefits Agreement signatories got some of the last words. James Caldwell (right) of BUILD (Brooklyn United for Innovative Local Development) told the crowd they didn’t know about Bruce Ratner’s “compassionate side.” Ratner has helped community members go to Nets games and other events, he said.
The government has to face many economic challenges, including the sharp drop in treasury income and increasing burden. How are they going to stimulate the economy through public spending? The government has been cutting subsidies while power tariffs and fuel prices will be increased. Together with the increase of tolls and housing prices, which are expected to increase by 10 per cent, the people’s purchasing power will fall.
Laughter filled the church; the tension and heaviness lifted for an instant. Just long enough to allow a breath. At the back of the church, several people turned to look at a tall, blonde man standing by the window. Mike nodded and broke out in a small grin. He remembered that parking lot conversation well and he understood. Even back then, he had no hard feelings.
If you read yesterdays piece, you know by now that AA (for short) misfired with the plane to Chicago, the only reason we were ever given being an operational decision. What that excuse means, anybody’s guess? But no, that isnt the cause of todays hilarity, this is.
the pick up, our shipper would be at your place to check on the present
39. Loves that I love high heels
Ziggy was wearing a tight black jacket with a piano tie floating in the wind!
I'm 76. Except for brief period in the 50's when I was doing my National Service, I've worked hard since I was 17. Except for some some serious health challenges, I put in 50-hour weeks, and didn't call in sick in nearly 40 years. I made a reasonable salary, but I didn't inherit my job or my income, and I worked to get where I am. Given the economy, it looks as though retirement was a bad idea, and I'm tired. Very tired.
Karen Lawless
For me: Im in a much better place. Enjoyin the horizon and not worryin….the punkometer is workin and Im goin on vacation soon.
Been back from a 17 day camping trip in the middle of the jungle….
Margaret McSweeneyPearl Girls
Melt the butter in a large heavy pot (I use my Dutch oven) over medium heat. Add the squash, apple, sweet potatoes, onion, shallot, and celery and cook over medium heat for about 5 minutes, stirring frequently. When the onions are softened, add enough stock to cover all of the vegetables. Put the lid on, but make sure it's vented -- I put mine on diagonally to allow steam to escape. Lower the heat a bit and simmer until all the vegetables are tender -- 30 to 40 minutes.
One striking detail of the ending that is often overlooked, however, comes in the seconds just before Artiguez dies in a hail of bullets on a hospital staircase. As Zinnemann’s camera spins faster and faster around the hospital ward, the last image that pops into Artiguez’ head is the memory of young Paco kicking a soccer ball into the air. It seems like a random image, at first, but maybe it’s reminding Artiguez of a time when he was younger, and was happier—before he devoted himself to a life of crime.
We’ve got a very busy diary over the next few weeks so make sure you keep checking the gigs page on our website for further details www.redhotwhite.co.uk
I hope that this action will help the Italian government reconsider Cam's situation. Without funds, Cam will be closed and its collection will effectively cease to exist. So put up your prices. Or sell the artwork to raise funds, rather than burning them.
Rnd 3) ch2, 2dc in first st, * dc in next st, 2dc in next st, repeat from * around, dc in last st. sl st to top of first dc, 33dc
My first instinct was to go for blue and white, but I also wanted a more eclectic vibe, not something quite so classically beach cottage. The house already reads mix-and-match eclectic with the pickle-green walls, a leather club chair in burgundy and another in forest green, a tribal rug in rich dark tones of wine-red, indigo blue, and browns, terra cotta tiles in the adjoining room which also features an antique (Tiffany-style) lampshade in leaded glass of cream, burgundy, and dark green.
(where did this little BELLY come from?), my energy levels changing, my
2. How will a Mrs. Kamla Persad Bissessar (“Mrs. Bissessar”) led UNC government assure the people of T&T that transparency and accountability will be a major goal of the UNC party rather than just lip service? What are the actual measures that would be put in place to address this?
For an administration that touts the importance of parent "choice", Bloomberg too seems eager to ignore the priorities of parents. Each year, in the DOE's own surveys, NYC parents say that their top "choice" for their children's schools would be reducing class size, yet each year for the last four, class sizes have increased.
Oh my.... I do have a card to share with you...imagine. It has been such a long time since I crafted anything (months) and this card was created months ago it seems like. Still need to get down to my space and do stuff.
It was politicized to a point of an ultimatum issued, at the juncture where BN is facing a by-election. It should be seen as a political black-mail, since the Indian ethnic form a very crucial ‘deciding factor’ in the N 05 Tenang by-election where no single race form the majority of the constituency.
Well that is it for my heart basket, I sure hope you will go
Up ASG-ish, down 1st Saddle. Horrible punchy, slippery windpack due to nearly 90mph gusts with lots of sand-blasting of exposed skin with ice crystals, courtesy of said wind gusts. Tough morning on the mountain for sure. Tossed in a minute or two of shuffle-running here and there on the descent. Shin responded not completely unfavorably.
Use your influence in supranational institutions
I recognize those cabinets, hinges and stove hood! They're the same as my own in my 80's era rental kitchen. Here, a sweet little frame has been put directly onto a cabinet door, and most of the focus goes to the beautiful (and newly? installed) butcher block counters, sink, and window with glass shelves. The hot pink flowers in the sink take it to the next level. I love it when stylists put flowers in the sink.
So instead of having rain & worrying about keeping everyone happy but dry, we had a day straight from the northern states. It was so cold that people were shaking! Living in S FL, we don't really know how to handle the cold weather. Sun? Rain? No problem. Temps below 70? We want to hibernate. When I left my house in the morning, it was a breezy 65. Not bad. Unless, like me, you were wearing shorts.
Arena 21: With the defeat that Yui and her sister has against the Araragi sisters, their loss just made themselves a vulnerable target for another Bakemonogatari contender, Shinobu. While it was a tag team match, if Karen and Tsuhiki can possibly replace Yui and Ui respectively in terms of power, then Shinobu, who should be as strong or possibly stronger than the two, should also have a change of defeating Yui. The victory should provide a good morale boost that someone like Shinobu has what it takes to defeat her K-On! lead guitarist and singer. I believe Shinobu does have a chance against Yui and may be the victor here.
A huge area of concern is that many people are taking matters into their own hands. I often witness residents using non-labeled pesticides that are not effective and very costly while vastly exposing themselves and their families to potential hazards by the misuse of these pesticides.
Psalm 94: 12-14, 17-19
Adult onset is typically in early to mid-adulthood, usually after or concurrent with transvestic fetishism. There are two different courses for the development of gender identity disorder:
During the English Civil War, King Charles I was permitted to play golf at Shieldfield whilst he was held prisoner at Newcastle by Parliamentarian forces.
4 evil
The shoemaker singing as he sits on his bench—the hatter singing as he stands;
There is something beautiful about all scars of whatever nature. A scar means the hurt is over, the wound is closed and healed, done with. -- Harry Crews
Hint: try making simple syrup from truvia or stevia instead of sugar to add into your favorite old cocktail recipes. I am in the process of toying with an orangecello recipe with calorie free sweetener instead of oldfashioned simple syrup. We’ll see!
“I’ll be at your house in ten minutes with the money.” The voice said urgently before hanging up.
Härkönen H, Holmberg PC. Obstetric histories of women occupationally exposed to styrene. Scand J Work Environ Health 1982; 8: 74-77.
Goodreads Summary: In a world with no poverty, no crime, no sickness and no unemployment, and where every family is happy, 12-year-old Jonas is chosen to be the community’s Receiver of Memories. Under the tutelage of the Elders and an old man known as the Giver, he discovers the disturbing truth about his utopian world and struggles against the weight of its hypocrisy. With echoes of Brave New World, in this 1994 Newbery Medal winner, Lowry examines the idea that people might freely choose to give up their humanity in order to create a more stable society. Gradually Jonas learns just how costly this ordered and pain-free society can be, and boldly decides he cannot pay the price.
Having attained the grand old age of 6 months, Lumpy has been taking the opportunity to indulge in some serious eating. No more boob-centric, boring old milky diet for him, oh no! He was going to be hitting some serious solid food. Well, solidish. Slop, mainly, to be honest. But, darn it, it was good slop. And he was going to make it his mission to eat all of it. Every last bit.
Emmanuelle Devos, Gilles’ Wife
Judaea… The word implies… “praise, celebration, worship”… This is talking about people like us… People who love the Lord… who worship… who praise God… Yet is spite of a worship vocabulary… there are unfulfilled desires in the heart… there are physical ailments in the body… and also economic needs.Jerusalem… This word means… “peace or double peace.” A lot of folks inwardly have the peace that comes with the forgiveness of sins… yet outwardly sickness is wrecking havoc with their lives. This could be reversed also… Outwardly we can look like everything.
“The message sent to you with the attempt by the hero Nigerian Umar Farouk Abdulmutallab is a confirmation of our previous message conveyed by the heroes of September 11.”
At 4-3, the eighth-ranked Ferrer battled to hold serve and defend his lead, but Djokovic was relentless, breaking him to take the set and, two games later, the match.
The other notable thing about the gateways, the RDN and Intute was the number of very capable people who were involved and the great amount of effort they put into the various projects. It’s almost certainly the case that Intute lasted as long as it did because it was so well managed and had such positive people working for it. Despite this, I would suggest, Intute essentially missed the boat, so to speak, and this was it’s main failure. I’ll get back to this later in this post.
And that’s without even going into the depths of what it says about women when we tell boys that being “girly” is “shameful.” Really? What does that make girls? What does it tell our little boys about the value of femininity?
Reminder: You can now subscribe to ipl2’s newsletter and weekly blog posts via email as well as RSS. The “Email Subscription” feature appears prominently in the upper left-hand side of the page on the ipl2′s News and Information WordPress blog. Subscription is free and open to all!
This song, which was performed by The Carpenters, is one that celebrates singing. Clearly you don’t always hear happy songs but I must say those are my favorites.
If you have found it very much, a guide to practice of Skyrim Skyrim players complete Skyrim now thanks to the game in the world of hard to find any location to discover how it is possible for even easier than taking a knee to the arrow on the map with the location that is every single hidden Skyrim. You’ll never again find yourself never the secret location of being able to feel frustrated and you will find, now will be able to simply Skyrim exactly what you will find at the following location to travel to stroll around, you know.
And that brings us to the generation, 2000 and following. What will be their descriptive title? What will be their defining moment and characteristic? Without sounding like a sour old man of a previous generation, will they be the Greediest Generation?
_____Its getting a bit late....I'm thinking it's about time you close your windows so I can go to my bed!! (funny stalker)
He spoke: ‘It is befitting to say more
Watching you sleep and aiming at your dreams.
Once I get home, I pull out my new favorite cookbook which was my first anniversary (paper) present from J: Williams-Sonoma's Cooking from the Farmers' Market. The cookbook is filled with gorgeous, art-quality photos of all types of produce in addition to delicious recipes, tips for buying the ripest produce and how to store almost any produce you could buy at the market. Then I grab a blank piece of paper and start researching.
Anyway, even if I were to grant everything I just refuted, the zombie apocalypse *still* wouldn’t happen. Why? Well, simply because every physical capability ascribed to zombies is complete nonsense.
Obviously not and no one informed me that it wasn’t proper for me to “be who I wanted to be” because I wanted to get the heck out of there and they made me stay. My class was divided into groups by abilities and I so vividly remember the first day we had our reading circle. Everyone was given a copy of the book we were going to learn to read and my teacher sat in the circle with us and read the first sentence very slowly. “Okay,” I thought, “this is just a warm-up and we’ll be done in no time.” I started reading the book and was done before the second child to her left had finished reading the sentences assigned to him after the first child had stuttered and stammered her way through her attempt before saying she didn’t know the words. When they finally got to me, I was ready. I was going to show these kids how it was done. The teacher called on me to read the next page and everyone was stunned that she’d ask me to read so much. I started reading and was almost done with it when I realized that she was trying to stop me. I hadn’t made any mistakes and was very confused. “You need to slow down,” she said. “Not everyone else can read like you can and they need to hear the words. You’re going too fast.”
3. Take a pair of scissors and remove the spiky ends.
I'm thinking upright Fuschia for the bottom and trailing Fuschia for the top - I luuuuurve Fuschia!
was signed. Interestingly all
26. 124 was spiteful. —Toni Morrison, Beloved (1987)
HIT uses the large muscles groups and muscle burns fat; so working the larger muscle groups with a bit of intensity thrown in will always be a HIT??!!
Lana has a very different style and voice – but I love it! Her album definitely is worth a buy so check it out! This is one of my favourite songs ‘off to the races’:
As someone who is pretty confident that I’m doing exactly what God has called me to do (and who loves doing it!), I thought I’d take a moment to share my journey. I don’t have a magic formula that will work for everybody; no four-step method to the perfect vocation. But I had a really good discussion about this last week with a group of college guys from our church, and if my experience is helpful to you as well, then may God receive the glory!
Let your baby walk around in the shoes. Make sure her feet don’t slip forwards or out of the shoes when she walks or stands on tip toe, as this could damage them. If her feet slip forwards this could squash her toes in the end of her shoes. Or if her shoes are too loose she’ll end up having to curl her feet and toes to prevent them slipping off.
Bell peppers or capsicums which are available in many colors are normally used to brighten up a dish. They are available in red, orange, green and yellow. The name ‘pepper’ was mistakenly given by Christopher Columbus when he brought it back to Europe from one of his voyage. He must have thought it to be the fruit of the highly prized during his era, the peppercorns. In order to taste the natural sweetness of bell pepper, I just stir fry it with preserved soya beans. This simple dish is very tasty and goes down well with steamed rice.
Regular adjectives are easy:
You can condense a lot of emotions in a song. Songs have a narrative aspect in Indian cinema, something that has been forgotten. A song has been reduced to a celebration. However, some songs can capture a sense of exhilaration in other ways – look at “Aaj Phir Jeene Ki Tamanna Hai” from Guide or “Chhaiyya Chhaiyya” from Dil Se.
By "extreme parties" she means the host population of the European countries and the UK, the "nefarious goals" are the re establishment of British values principles and practices and religion within the UK.
But today The Mail on Sunday can reveal that a leading member of Prof Muller’s team has accused him of trying to mislead the public by hiding the fact that BEST’s research shows global warming has stopped.
However that may be, I have found fairy-stories endlessly compelling throughout my life. Indeed, I think I find them more compelling, now I'm in my fifties, than I did when I was five. Then they were a good yarn. Now I find that, like the dark well at the foot of the World Tree, they hold fathoms deep of a not always kindly wisdom.
61. Sold Girl Scout Cookies
The aim of this conference is to convene a commemorative series of activities on the intellectual legacy of Schumpeter with specific reference to developing countries. Specific objectives of the initiative are to:
I’m often up at dawn, though I’m not sure I took this picture. I have some sketchy memories from this time period. I miss not having a schedule. On the days I work, I’m also usually up at dawn, but laying in bed staring at the alarm clock with one eye because I HATE the alarm clock, and I also hate schedules.
Some recipes don't specify hop varieties, mainly because the alpha acid content is hops can vary. Instead these recipes call for HBUs or Home Bittering Units. The final recipe will usually have a IBU (International Bitterness Unit) rating to indicate what the final bitterness of the beer will be. If you brew to style, these figures are vital!
"Currently, Shenzhen Proview is still the legitimate registered owner of the iPad trademark," Fu Shuangjian, deputy minister of the State Administration for Industry and Commerce, told reporters, according to an online transcript.
Phoner A phone interview
Now here's the thing. I honestly believe you could read stock quotes and SpongeBob to your kids, but who wants to? Ugh. Eventually it's good to read something that both parents and kids will enjoy.
Adam refused to give his name when asked for it. The police then issued him a ticket without a name on it and stuck it on the windscreen of his car.
… A TSUNAMI WARNING IS IN EFFECT …
In a small saucepan, heat all the dressing ingredients and bring to a boil. Immediately pour dressing over the salad vegetables and toss well.
4. Place on a greased baking sheets and bake for about 25 minutes until pale golden brown. Leave to cool on a wire rack.
YES
Every day begins to look like this:
NARS multiple stick in Luxor. I think I own every single multiple this man has ever created, and the latest one, Luxor does not disappoint. It is an iridescent pink that looks amazing as a highlighter, as well as under the eyes if you're fair. It really "perks" up my face and gives me a faux glow--great for those mornings where I don't have a ton of time to get ready, but don't want to scare the public.
I’m probably better off talking about what it feels like to be a tourist in there and mention a couple of things we saw. The link in the text above is good for giving a view of some of the things that are tough to see from the floor of the chapel, along with history behind its construction.
Will write Day 5 from hospital tomorrow night!! Hopefully I don't fall behind again.
Yep, let's talk popcorn. And, given our current topic, let's make peanut butter popcorn.
The ongoing chaos in both Egypt and Syria offers few certainties. But one fact is already clear: The military opportunities Israel wasted in recent years won’t come again, and those missed opportunities will likely cost it dearly.
Enjoy the Game
Are you comfortable or uncomfortable with religion/spiritual themes in books? Do you think there is a time and place for that theme? What about "angels and demons" books? Is that a trend you're interested in seeing more of?
A clay rolling tool - I use a section of an old metal arrow shaft.
One man had been in this country for 30 years! He said, “how can they send me back? I AM this country! I MADE this country!”
I slapped her other cheek, then again on the first, then a few more times. I know that every slap after the first couple actually hurts, and unless you have a brain disorder, you don’t actually like the physical sensation of pain. But there is another layer, as if a psychic wound begins to open in an intriguing way that is similar to the pain/pleasure of working a tooth loose.
I'm pinching myself ...how blessed am I?!
Well 2009 is quickly coming to a close.
- Africa and Russia would be true Empire size, China, Europe and Old Rome (the planetary/Archon worshippers under the Legions) barely making the size requirement
I sketched out the idea for a card awhile back and finally had the time to sit down and make it happen. As I pulled out papers to work on it I realized it would make a great set of cards so that's just what I did, I could not be more pleased with how they turned out.
confidential drafts of key statements to News Corp before making them public -- a move News Corp itself says was "absolutely illegal".
Later that day our dog got bumped bya car – Thankfully he was just fine
It was when we decided to leave for a brief breakfast break that he chose to take his last breath. I like to think he chose his time to pass… When he felt like we had forgiven him and we weren’t there to watch him go. I couldn’t look at him. I couldn’t hold his hand.
Unfortunately, some *sshole record company lawyer has forced Youtube to take the original version of this song down (while leaving up a couple of dozen other Dukes of Stratosphear songs) -- so I had to embed a cover of the song by They Might Be Giants. It's not as good as the original, but it's not bad.
Last summer, we successfully installed a rock wall, did all of our trenching and sprinkler installation, laid sod, poured the rest of our driveway and RV pad, had curbing laid, planted trees, shrubs, flowers, etc. etc etc. We made huge progress last summer, but there were lots of finishing touches that still needed to be made. Also, several of our trees and shrubs died this winter, so we had to replace almost all of them. I can happily now say that we transformed the front yard from this:
I believe they would not leave unless it was the best thing for them, their family and their future and that should always be their top priority.
Reuse gift bags and tissue paper for Christmas, birthday and baby shower gifts. My children know to look in the storage cabinet in my bedroom for an assortment of gift bags. It's fun to see the same bags reappear year after year!
The following day I had plans to see The Hunger Games with a friend. In the middle of the movie, I got a phone call from a number I didn’t recognize. It turns out with was The Ex’s brother calling to say he was in my area and he wanted to pick up the TV. Needless to say, I was slightly pissed. I had broken up with The Ex six weeks earlier, and if he wanted to take the TV he should have done so when he moved out.
Significance of Replica Watches
Everyday, he’s researching in his empty yet brightly lit studio in Toronto. Researching what’s going on, what’s relevant? He feels it’s the only way to move forward.
Introductions of Characters.
Men, God: love this
The problem is, here, there is only one stretch of sidewalk and it only runs for two blocks. So the majority of my run was off the side of the road, in the dirt. Dirt is hard to run on for me. I had to be extra careful not to trip on the weeds and bumps and my feet sunk in just enough that it was hard to get my speed going. I think I could get used to it, if I had to but right now I'm missing my pace on the sidewalk. I added 30 seconds to my running time. It's not a ton, but I feel it. My running pace has been doing ok, but my overall has been dropping each time I run, I think I need to focus on making sure I still walk at a decent speed. Just a few goals to work on in the next week and a half.
*UPDATE (March 22, 2012): We've had one in for a couple of days in preparation for a review and it's surprisingly effective. This takes graphics tablets to the next level.
Oh, I know, for most of us, it goes against anything we are familiar with, and the sheer thought might scare you, if you've never considered anything like it.
Wed 11/12 Cleveland, OH House of Blues
Is it wrong to argue about religion? We have heard it said, “There are two things you don’t discuss; religion and politics.” I ask, “Why not?” Well, for one thing, it could very easily get you into trouble. It did for those people Saul of Tarsus sought to punish.
I put my hands around her head just to make sure that’s really what it was. I don’t know what I thought it was going to be, but I didn’t push at all. Literally his head just popped out. Steven was looking really shocked. I yelled at him “SHE’S FINE!” Even though I thought the baby was a boy and didn’t actually know what we were having. I didn’t want to push, like I did with Iris, because I didn’t want to tear. So once I felt her head pop out I wanted to slow it down and breathe her out and she came flying out into my hands, she was not slow at all!
(The mind boggles.)
Antique chainlink bracelet, stolen from mom.
It is to die for. To. die. for.
Of those students who admitted cyberbullying others relatively frequently:
I am learning to laugh at this because it is a terrible problem and one that any body might have to face sooner or later.
RaeLynn, Wake Up Call – First of all, I LOVED that she performed a Maroon 5 song. I always like it when people perform other people’s songs in front of them. I can’t figure out my feelings on RaeLynn, though. I think she’s adorable and I really like her, but sometimes her voice confuses me. I don’t think I would like her voice too much if she wasn’t so pleasant herself. She was very into her performance, and I liked the twang she sang the song with. Adam looked a little confused when she started singing, but then he seemed really into it. And at the end, she ran off stage to give him a hug. I can’t say I blame her…I would run and hug him too. I’m not ready to see her go yet, so I hope she survives tonight’s elimination.
One of my cherished friends told me that she doesn't understand my American sense of patriotism, and she asked me "what does it mean to love a country?". I had no answer for her, but her question is one that I periodically take out, turn over, hold up to the light, and poke at. What does it mean to love a country? What does it mean to love a country?
I have lost my house keys which is fairly annoying, as it also has work keys on, and given the snow that looks set in at the moment and the fact that most of my colleagues live far outside Exeter (ranging from Honiton to Bridgwater to Keynsham), if the road network fails us I might be having to try and break into the office on Monday morning.
